CHAPTER 4

When Rationality Fails: Biases of the Mind

On September 15, 2004, in the midst of a contentious labor dispute, the National Hockey League locked out its players. Five months and hundreds of canceled games later, the NHL officially called off the season. In doing so, it became the first major-league sport in U.S. history to lose an entire season to a labor dispute.

What went wrong? Under the leadership of Commissioner Gary Bettman, the NHL expanded ambitiously throughout the 1990s, adding nine new U.S. teams, building new arenas, generating publicity, and increasing television time for the sport. But in its quest to ramp up its visibility and profits, NHL management allowed player salaries to reach unsustainable heights. By 2003, according to the league, salaries were 75 percent of NHL revenues—a 34 percent increase from the 1990–91 season. By comparison, the National Football League paid its players 64 percent of revenues; the National Basketball Association paid 57 percent.

By 2004, the NHL could no longer ignore its growing financial dilemma. Nineteen of thirty franchises lost money during the 2003–04 season; the league claimed to have lost $225 million in this same period. The sale of television rights was also disappointing. As a result, NHL management decided to take a hard line at the start of the 2004–05 season. The league sought a reduction in average player salary from $1.8 million to $1.3 million. In addition to salary rollbacks, Commissioner Bettman demanded “cost certainty,” a salary cap limiting payrolls to a maximum of 55 percent of team revenues.

On December 9, 2004, the NHL Players’ Association (NHLPA) agreed to a 24 percent rollback of existing salaries but refused to link payroll to revenue. Bettman set a mid-February deadline for reaching agreement or canceling the season. On February 14, 2005, NHL owners proposed a salary cap that did not tie payroll to revenue. After further negotiation, the owners’ salary cap offer stood at $42.5 million per team. The NHLPA came down from demanding a $52-million-per-team cap to $49 million, with certain exceptions.

“To be this close, they have to make a deal,” Mighty Ducks player Mike Leclerc told the Los Angeles Times as Bettman’s deadline approached. “It would be disgraceful to cancel the season.” Yet the deadline passed without agreement, and Bettman officially announced that the season had ended before it even began. Almost 400 of the NHL’s 700-plus players defected to European teams for the season; older players found their careers suddenly cut short. Many felt betrayed by both their union and their team owners. Public sentiment was divided early on but quickly turned against the players, who were viewed as unrealistic and greedy.

On July 21, 2005, the NHL and the NHLPA finally ended the 310-day lockout and set the 2005–06 hockey season in motion by ratifying a collective-bargaining agreement. Backed by nearly 90 percent of NHL players, the agreement called for a $39-million-per-team salary cap—a $10 million decrease in the NHLPA’s previous demands—and lower than what the league had offered five months earlier. Other cost-certainty measures were also included: payrolls would not exceed 54 percent of team revenues, all current player contracts were rolled back by 24 percent, and the arbitration clause was changed to make it less advantageous to the players. The players received only nominal concessions in return (e.g., a guaranteed salary minimum per team). Major league hockey, a “gate-driven” sport that earns about three-f
ifths of its revenue from ticket sales, was now faced with the uphill challenge of luring fans back into stadiums in significant numbers.

Why would the players’ union reject an offer for $42.5 million in February only to accept $39 million in July? Why did they sacrifice a season’s worth of revenues and goodwill to hold out for less? By most accounts, the deal that was eventually signed was achievable before the lockout. Why, then, did the two sides fail to avoid the loss of a season? Were the dispute, the lockout, and the cancellation of the 2004–05 season necessary and inevitable events? It is our view that the whims of fate are not to blame; rather, the negotiation failed in large part due to preventable negotiation mistakes.

WHEN REASON FAILS US

Daniel Kahneman received the 2002 Nobel Prize in Economics for his work with Amos Tversky on the systematic ways that the human mind deviates from rationality. This profound work has led to scientific revolutions in many fields, including economics, psychology, finance, law, medicine, and marketing. This work has also transformed the field of negotiation. Prior to the influence of what is known as behavioral decision research, negotiators were simply urged to approach problems from a rational perspective—in other words, they were told to take certain logical frameworks (e.g., very early versions of what we have developed in Chapters 1–3) and to “go be rational.”

By contrast, behavioral decision research emphasizes that while advising negotiators to be rational is necessary, it is far from sufficient. Negotiators also need to be made aware of the mental habits and biases that might prevent them from following rational advice. Behavioral decision researchers have learned a great deal about the nature of the mistakes that we make in negotiations, how we can avoid such mistakes in our own thinking, and how we can anticipate and leverage them in the behavior of others. In this chapter and the next, we will help you develop the self-awareness and rationality that is often missing when negotiators are unprepared, caught off guard, or shoot from the hip. We will also assist you in anticipating the thoughts and moves of your negotiation opponents and partners.

Of course, it’s not news that people are irrational and sometimes make mistakes. What is news is that, in the context of decision-making and negotiation, many of the mistakes people make are systematic and predictable. In fact, even the brightest of executives fall victim to four critical, systematic errors on a regular basis: the fixed-pie bias, the vividness bias, nonrational escalation of commitment, and susceptibility to framing.

THE FIXED-PIE BIAS

Recall our story from Chapter 3, in which Chris was called in to break an impasse over exclusivity terms between his company’s team of negotiators and the European supplier. The U.S. negotiation team assumed that only one of the two companies could get what it wanted on the issue of exclusivity: either exclusivity would be awarded or it would not be awarded. Luckily, Chris’s very simple question about why the European firm would not allow exclusivity revealed that the supplier only wanted to retain the right to provide small amounts of the product to his cousin. Meanwhile, the U.S. firm did not mind if the supplier sold a few hundred pounds to a local firm, as long as the supplier could guarantee exclusivity otherwise. Thus, what appeared to be one issue (exclusivity) was, in fact, two separate issues: exclusivity over the first few hundred pounds of product and exclusivity over the bulk of the supply. Despite appearances, one party did not have to lose for the other to win.

Sometimes negotiation is about only one issue. As in the Hamilton Real Estate case in Chapter 1, such negotiations are typically zero-sum in nature: one party can gain only at the expense of the other (assuming they reach agreement). Such negotiations are said to have a “fixed pie” of value or resources: the only thing negotiators can do is slice up the pie and try to get a big piece of it.

In contrast, most negotiations involve more than one issue, including delivery, service, financing, bonuses, timing, and relationships. In Chapters 2 and 3, we explained that the presence of multiple issues allows negotiators to create value by making wise trade-offs; we also offered concrete strategies for finding such trade-offs. Here, we add the warning that negotiators often fail to create value because they assume there is a fixed pie of value or resources even when it is possible to increase the size of the pie. In Chris’s story, as in many successful negotiation stories, success required overcoming the fixed-pie bias and moving toward a mutually beneficial trade.

The fixed-pie bias affects even the most seasoned negotiators, causing them to focus exclusively on capturing value for themselves and to ignore approaches that could create value. Congressman Floyd Spence (R-South Carolina) once analyzed a proposed agreement over nuclear disarmament between the United States and the Soviet Union and concluded, “I have had a philosophy for some time in regard to SALT [the proposed agreement], and it goes like this: the Russians will not accept a SALT treaty that is not in their best interest, and it seems to me that if it is in their best interest, it can’t be in our best interest.” Spence’s fixed-pie mind-set risked exposing the world to a higher probability of nuclear annihilation; he overlooked the possibility that both nations might benefit from disarmament activities.

One of Max’s previous books, written with Jonathan Baron and Katherine Shonk, documented a multitude of ways in which the fixed-pie assumption leads to conflict between perceived opponents—and to value destruction for society. Consider the story of Benjamin Cone, Jr., a forester who inherited 7,200 acres of land in North Carolina in 1982. Cone had tended to and preserved his land by planting fodder, conducting controlled burns, and keeping their timber sales low. Not surprisingly, songbirds, wild turkey, quail, and deer thrived on the property.

In 1991, a biologist hired by Cone informed him that approximately twenty-nine red-cockaded woodpeckers, members of an endangered species, were living in his woods. Responding to the 1973 Endangered Species Act (ESA), the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service took control of the woodpeckers’ habitat—which was 1,560 acres, or about 15 percent of Cone’s property. Following the loss of this property, Cone drastically altered the way he forested the remaining 85 percent of his land. To keep the woodpeckers from taking over his entire property, he switched from the sustainable practices he had learned from his family and began clear-cutting (i.e., eliminating all trees and vegetation) 500 acres of forest every year. As he had hoped, clear-cutting prevented the woodpeckers from expanding their habitat—but this was a Pyrrhic victory. Cone had destroyed significant economic and environmental value in order to “win” the fight against woodpeckers and the ESA.

Cone’s response was clearly not what the authors of the Endangered Species Act had in mind when they wrote the legislation. But Cone decided to clear-cut his forest because he felt he had to choose between destroying his trees and donating them to the woodpeckers.

The fixed-pie bias not only makes value creation difficult, it can also lead to reactive devaluation: the tendency of negotiators to denigrate and devalue another party’s concessions simply because these are being offered by an adversary. A study of how U.S. citizens responded to an arms-reduction proposal showed this tendency in action. Researchers divided 137 study participants into two groups and then asked how favorable the proposal was to the United States and how favorable it was to the (now former) U.S.S.R. One group was correctly informed that the proposal was made by then–Communist Party secretary Gorbachev. The other group was falsely told that the proposal was made by then-president Reagan. Among those who believed the proposal originated with Gorbachev, 56 percent thought that the proposal favored the U.S.S.R. and only 16 percent felt that it favored the United States. The other 28 percent thought that it favored both sides equally. When participants were told that the proposal came from President Reagan, however, only 27 percent thought that it favored the U.S.S.R., another 27 percent thought it favored the United States, and 45 percent thought that it benefited both sides equally.

As this study demonstrates, even terms that appear mutually beneficial when you advance them may seem disadvantageous when proposed by the other party. Likewise, when the other party concedes on an issue, a negotiator may devalue the issue’s worth: “If she’s willing to make that concession, this issue must not be important.” Or, when the other party seems happy, a negotiator may assume he got a bad deal: “If she is happy, we must have lost.” These tendencies are all rooted in the fixed-pie bias, which mistakenly leads us to believe that “whatever is good for them is bad for us.” The effect of this bias is also visible in the NHL dispute. Both parties focused on divisive issues related to salary, but ignored pie-enlarging issues such as salvaging the season, increasing revenues, and simply playing hockey. Moreover, the players eventually accepted an offer that was remarkably similar to—and perhaps worse than—what they could have received prior to the lockout. Unfortunately, because the offer came from the owners, the players immediately devalued it.

Chapters 2 and 3 outlined a number of strategies for value creation (e.g., negotiating multiple issues simultaneously, making multiple offers simultaneously, using contingency contracts, et cetera). Even before you attempt these strategies, however, it is important to be aware that your initial, automatic response in negotiation may be guided by a fixed-pie mentality and that you may need to adjust your thinking accordingly.

Bottom line: when approaching any important negotiation, enter the process with the goal of looking for areas in which you can create value. It is better to assume that you can enlarge the pie and later find out that you were wrong than to assume the pie is fixed and never find out you were wrong.

THE VIVIDNESS BIAS

Top MBA students from prestigious universities are in a strong position to negotiate with their employers for the issues critical to their career and personal happiness. These students are smart, well trained, and highly valued by the finest firms in the world. Thus, negotiating the right job package should be easy for this group. If this is the case, then why do so many MBA students change jobs very soon after accepting their first position? One important reason is that they are affected by the vividness bias. Specifically, they pay too much attention to vivid features of their offers and overlook less vivid features that could have a greater impact on their satisfaction. This is a potential trap even for seasoned negotiators.

At the Harvard Business School, MBA students spend a lot of time in a student center

 called Spangler. As recruiting season arrives, the most popular topic of conversation at Spangler revolves around interviews and job offers. Consider the statements that students might make in Spangler about different jobs:

• The medical benefits are very good.
• The company is located within ten miles of where I grew up.
• People seemed very happy during my visit to corporate headquarters.
• I would get to travel to Europe on a regular basis.
• The starting salary is $140,000.
• Employees have significant control over their work assignments.
• The office space is very nice.
• The offer is from McKinsey.
• I will not have to travel much.

Of these statements, which ones stand out? Which will travel fastest through the MBA student grapevine? Which statements convey the highest prestige? We believe that the answers to all of these questions are the high salary ($140,000) and the offer from McKinsey (a top consulting firm). These two items are not only the easiest to communicate quickly, but also the easiest for others to evaluate. Students who receive these offers will notice the impressed reactions of their peers when such information is shared, and these reactions will make the information more prominent in their mind. As conversation after conversation focuses on these two factors, other aspects of the offer will be overshadowed or entirely sidelined. One result: students accept—and soon quit—high-paying jobs with prestigious firms because they overweighted vivid or prestigious attributes of their offers and under-weighted other issues that would affect their professional and personal satisfaction, such as office location, collegiality, and travel. (Notably, some research suggests that this error affects men more than women.)

More generally, vivid information has a greater effect on negotiators than does dull (but equally valuable) information. Imagine a group of executives discussing where to allocate R&D dollars within their company. The CEO asks each executive in the room for his or her opinion, and each provides arguments that would channel more funds to his or her own division. Why? In part, it may be that the executives are self-interested and seeking to maximize their personal benefits. But on a less conscious level, each executive can vividly imagine how he or she would use the funds in his or her own unit. They will ignore possibilities that are less vivid (but no less valuable), such as how others will utilize the funds. Similarly, the CEO herself is likely to be most influenced by the option that is best on vivid features (e.g., projected sales, cost estimates, and return on investment) and to underweight other important considerations (e.g., time to completion, complexity of implementation, and opportunity costs).

The NHL players and team owners may have also fallen prey to the vividness bias. Certain vivid figures were clearly motivating the hardline approach of both parties—salaries as a percentage of revenues and salary cap chief among them. Other important considerations, such as daily loss of revenues, reputation effects, and changes to the game’s rules that could increase the size of the pie, were overshadowed and seemingly under-weighted. The willingness of players to finally accept terms that were significantly lower than their earlier demands on these vivid issues seems to suggest that other (nonvivid) issues did eventually surface and helped the disputants to reach agreement. By this time, of course, a season had been lost.

What can you do to avoid overweighting vivid information in negotiations? In addition to anticipating the vividness bias, here are two strategies that will help you overcome it:

Create a scoring system. In Chapter 2, we described the process of creating a scoring system and explained how to use one to evaluate offers and structure appropriate counteroffers. A scoring system can also help defend against the vividness bias by keeping you focused on your true interests. If you cross-check your reactions

 and strategy against the content of your scoring system, you will avoid overweighting vivid issues in your decisions.

A colleague of ours, who now teaches negotiation at Carnegie Mellon University, took this advice to heart when he was looking for a faculty position some years ago. He began to list all of the aspects of an offer that would have some value to him. He ended up with a scoring system that had weights assigned to almost forty separate attributes, ranging from “what my wife likes” (weighted at 50 percent) to the distance to the closest national park and average rainfall. We believe that our friend went a little overboard. On the other hand, an MBA student who does not have at least five to ten issues ranked and weighted in her scoring system is probably not thinking rationally enough about all of the important issues in her job negotiations. Our colleague may have wasted an afternoon of his time; the MBA student may end up wasting a year of her life.

Separate information from influence. In Chapter 1, we introduced the importance of separating information from influence; we revisit this principle here, as it can help you overcome the vividness bias. Consider the fact that the same salesperson who convinces you of a car’s reliability by showing you its rating in Car and Driver can also convince you to purchase an expensive extended warranty for the same car by vividly describing the horrors of high repair costs that were once incurred by someone just like you. Though contradictory, these two pieces of information can both influence you in ways that benefit the salesperson. Given that nearly 50 percent of new-car buyers purchase these (typically overpriced) extended warranties, it seems that many people do not try to reconcile the contradiction; instead, they fall prey to the power of vividness. When faced with a tough decision, negotiation geniuses remember to ask themselves these critical questions: Is this information valuable? Have I learned something new? Am I just being influenced to act in a certain way because of how this information was presented?

NONRATIONAL ESCALATION OF COMMITMENT

Imagine that you are attending an executive class on negotiation with many other experienced managers. The professor takes a $100 bill out of his pocket and announces the following:

I am about to auction off this $100 bill. You are free to participate or just watch the bidding of others. Bidding will start at $5, and people will be invited to call out bids in multiples of $5 until no further bidding occurs, at which point the highest bidder will pay the amount bid and win the $100. The only feature that distinguishes this auction from traditional auctions is a rule that the second-highest bidder must also pay the amount that he or she bids, although he or she will obviously not win the $100. For example, if Maria bids $15 and Jamaal bids $20, and the bidding stops, Jamaal will get $80 (the $100 he wins minus the $20 he bid) and Maria, the second-highest bidder, will pay me $15 (the amount she bid).

Now, what would be your strategy? Would you bid in the auction?

Max has run this auction dozens of times, and previously ran similar $20 auctions hundreds of times. The typical outcome: Max wins lots of money.

Here’s how it happens. The bidding starts out enthusiastically. At around $60–$80, everyone except the two highest bidders usually drops out of the auction. The two bidders then begin to feel the tension. Suppose that one bidder has bid $70 and the other has bid $75. The $70 bidder must either bid $80 or stop bidding and suffer a sure loss of $70 (which he must pay as the second-highest bidder). The uncertainty associated with bidding further seems more attractive than the certain loss, so the $70 bidder bids $80, and the bids continue until they reach $95 and then $100. The room grows quiet as the class focuses on the $95 bidder, who must decide whether to accept a $95 loss or continue bidding past $100 in hopes that the other party will quit first. The class laughs as the $95 bidder inevitably bids $105. Bidding in this auction typically ends somewhere between $100 and $1,000.

Why do people start bidding in this auction? Clearly, it is because they are attracted by the possibility of winning and making money. But why do they continue to bid past $100? Because they are trapped—strategically and psychologically. Strategically, once an individual has entered the $100 auction and is among the final two bidders, it takes only a small additional bid to stay in the auction rather than quit—and it seems reasonable to do so. After all, one more bid may be all that is needed to get the other party to quit first. But if both bidders pursue this seemingly rational strategy, the bidding can increase to extremely high levels, with disastrous results for both parties.

Strategy is not the only pitfall in the $100 auction—nor in the countless other negotiations, disputes, and conflicts where individuals, firms, and nations escalate their commitment to a failing course of action. Research on the nonrational escalation of commitment reveals that negotiators have a strong psychological need to justify (to themselves and to others) their prior decisions and behaviors. It is often difficult for negotiators to admit that their initial strategy was ill conceived or that they may have made a mistake; to avoid acknowledging these facts, they will escalate their commitment even when it is extremely costly, and perhaps disastrous, to do so. Deepak and his colleagues have demonstrated that emotion can compound the escalation problem.[12] Their research on competitive arousal reveals that interactions that heighten feelings of rivalry can create in negotiators the desire to “win at any cost

.” Of course, as in the $100 auction, “winning” and “making money” may not be the same thing; if bidding continues past $100, even the “winner” loses!

Nonrational escalation of commitment occurs across a wide variety of real-world situations. Custody battles, labor strikes, joint-venture dissolutions, bidding wars, lawsuits, price wars, ethnic conflicts, and countless other disputes all have the potential of spiraling out of control. When all of the escalation forces—the hope of victory, the need to justify initial strategy, and the desire to beat the other side—come together, simple common sense often flies out the window. If disputants are unable to rein in their desire to escalate commitment, what may have seemed like a smart strategy initially (making a bid, threatening litigation, competing on price, etc.) may lead to disastrous results. Escalation is all the more likely if negotiators believe they have “too much invested to quit now,” if they have already incurred significant losses, if they dislike the other party and want to “win” at any cost, or if they have made a public commitment to their position. Think back to the NHL dispute. In that example, all of these factors were in play!

Imagine that you are a player in the NHL. The lockout was instituted almost five months ago, and the entire season is now in jeopardy. You do not want to see any more of the season (and its revenues) squandered; then again, you do not want to relinquish your demands, either. Will you be able to admit to yourself that your initial strategy has not worked? That you were wrong to have held out for a better deal for so long? That you now should agree to an offer that for months you have been saying is unfair? Will you be able to overcome your animosity toward the team owners and make the concessions they demand? Sounds difficult. Is there any way to avoid falling prey to the nonrational escalation of commitment?

In response to similar disputes in major league sports, Harvard Business School professors James Sebenius and Michael Wheeler devised a very useful strategy:[13] They advise disputants to end the strike or lockout and to resume the season immediately—but, important, they stipulate that the team owners should be prohibited from receiving any of the revenue and that the players should not receive any pay. Instead, the revenues and forgone pay are to be placed in an escrow account until a resolution to the conflict is reached. A critical provision of this arrangement is that a sizable portion of the escrow fund would be given to charity if the parties failed to reach agreement in a timely fashion. In other words, either you do whatever it takes to reach a deal, or the size of the pie shrinks! Sebenius and Wheeler argue that watching the funds pile up—and fearing that they could disappear—should provoke both sides to agree on a contract.

If the possibility of reaching such an agreement in the midst of intense conflict seems unrealistic, consider the 2005 dispute involving faulty brakes in the fast-speed ACELA trains on the East Coast of the United States. It became clear that the trains had unacceptable cracks in their brakes and that the brakes would need to be replaced. It was less clear who was responsible for the cracks and who should cover the costs incurred from closing down the ACELA for months. Three companies were potentially responsible: Amtrak, which had purchased the trains; Bombardier, the company that had made the trains; and Knorr, the German company that sold the brakes to Bombardier. Not surprisingly, the parties disagreed about who was to blame. Surprisingly, however, the three parties quickly agreed that they would first solve the brake problem and get ACELA running again as soon

 as possible; only then would they turn to the question of who would pay for the losses incurred by the failure and for the cost of repairs. The companies saved tens of millions of dollars by agreeing to focus first on common interests—and to avoid an escalation of the conflict.

In their negotiations during the 2004–05 season, why didn’t the NHL and the NHLPA pursue a wise strategy such as the one outlined by Sebenius and Wheeler, or the one implemented by Amtrak, Bombardier, and Knorr? Largely because both parties—and perhaps especially the players—had fallen prey to the nonrational escalation of commitment: they became so locked in to pursuing their initial course of action that they ignored blatant signals that suggested a change in strategy was necessary.

How can you avoid escalating in the heat of battle? Here are three ideas to consider.

Start your negotiation with a preplanned exit strategy. In the $100 auction, since neither party knows when the other party will quit, it is difficult to conclude that bidding “just once more” is clearly a bad decision. Unfortunately, this is a slippery slope—whether for bidders participating in the $100 auction, disputants pursuing litigation, or nations whose presidents have committed them to war. This is why it is important to decide in advance the point at which you will cut your losses and stop bidding, litigating, or fighting, should the situation spiral out of control. Of course, this limit should be adjusted as events unfold if you obtain new information relevant to your strategy (e.g., if you learn that the other side has run out of money).

Assign and reward a “devil’s advocate” whose job it is to criticize your decisions and find faults in your logic. Whom should you pick for this task? The person should have the following three characteristics: they should be trustworthy, they should not have invested in or helped to design the initial strategy, and they should have no conflict of interest regarding the final outcome. In negotiation, it is tempting to surround yourself with like-minded, supportive people who will be easy to deal with and who will boost your confidence. However, when it comes to dealing with the dangerous effects of escalation, you do not need confidence, but rather clarity of thought and good judgment. Since it is not always possible to keep your wits about you, it is a good idea to have someone close at hand whose unbiased judgment you trust.

Anticipate and prepare for the escalation forces you are likely to encounter. For example, if you are concerned about the need to justify your initial decisions to constituents, you might refrain from committing publicly to a specific course of action. Or if you think that personal animosity is likely to fuel your desire to escalate conflict, it may be better to let others in your team or organization (who are less personally invested) take over substantive negotiations when emotions are running high.

In the context of escalation, then, negotiation genius means a number of things: learning to identify competitive traps, understanding the causes and consequences of escalation, and preparing in advance to “de-escalate” or cut your losses as necessary. By understanding how escalation of commitment works, you will not only avoid expensive mistakes, but be better equipped to anticipate the potentially irrational behavior of your opponents.

SUSCEPTIBILITY TO FRAMING

Consider the choices presented in the “Asian Disease Problem,” first discussed by Amos Tversky and Daniel Kahneman:

Imagine that the United States is preparing for the outbreak of an unusual Asian disease that is expected to kill six hundred people. Two alternative programs to combat the disease have been proposed. Assume that the exact scientific estimates of the consequences of the programs are as follows. Which of the two programs would you favor?

Program A: If Program A is adopted, two hundred people will be saved.
Program B: If Program B is adopted, there is a one-third probability that six hundred people will be saved and a two-thirds probability that no people will be saved.

Before reading further, choose whether you would prefer to implement Program A or B. Now, for the same problem, decide which of the following two options you would favor:

Program C: If Program C is adopted, four hundred people will die.
Program D: If Program D is adopted, there is a one-third probability that no one will die and a two-thirds probability that six hundred people will die.

If you read carefully, you will discover that Program A and Program C are identical: both result in two hundred lives saved and four hundred lives lost. Program B and Program D are also identical: both lead to a one-third probability of saving everyone and a two-thirds probability of losing everyone. In other words, if people prefer Program A to Program B, then they should also (obviously) prefer Program C to Program D. As it turns out, this is not how people respond. When different groups are given these two sets of options, Program A is favored over Program B (by 72 percent of respondents in Tversky and Kahneman’s initial research), but Program D is favored over Program C (by 78 percent of respondents). Why are people so inconsistent in their preferences?

It turns out that the critical factor is how the options are framed. The two sets of options are identical, but changing the description from “lives saved” to “lives lost” makes people think very differently. Even when the expected values are similar, we tend to be risk averse when thinking about potential gains and risk seeking when thinking about potential losses. In other words, we want the “sure thing” when we have something to gain, but want “all or nothing” when we have something to lose. This is why people choose the less risky program (saving two hundred people with certainty) when thinking about lives saved and the more risky program (saving six hundred people but with only one-third probability) when thinking about lives lost. This problem illustrates the power of framing.

Research on framing effects reveals that most of us will treat risks involving perceived gains (e.g., profits) differently from risks involving perceived losses (e.g., losing a court settlement). This way of thinking can powerfully affect our negotiation behavior. For example, we are much more

 likely to make concessions and try to compromise when we are negotiating over how to allocate gains (profits, rewards, bonuses, windfalls, etc.), but more likely to be inflexible and risk reaching an impasse when we are negotiating over how to allocate losses (costs, penalties, and so on). We are also more likely to quit negotiating in favor of the risky path of litigation when involved in a dispute over who is responsible for assuming costs, losses, and liabilities than when the dispute concerns the share of profit that each side is entitled to receive.

Now imagine the following scenario. You have just arrived at a casino and are sitting down to play blackjack. How likely are you to make a $100 bet? Now imagine that you have been playing blackjack for an hour and are already down $600. How likely are you to make a $100 bet? It turns out that people are more willing to take a risk (gambling $100) when they are already in the domain of losses (down $600). Losing your first $100 is much more painful than losing the seventh or even the second $100. Once you are a “loser,” you won’t mind digging yourself into a bigger hole (i.e., losing even more) as long as there is some possibility of digging yourself out entirely.

Now imagine that you have already lost $600—but not at the casino. Instead, the stock market took a slight hit earlier in the week and your investment portfolio lost $600 in value. How will you behave that night at the blackjack table? It turns out you will not want to take the same risks that you took after losing $600 at the casino. In other words, the question is not whether or not you are a loser, but whether or not you feel like a loser in the current situation. Whether or not you feel like a loser depends on your reference point—the comparisons you make to other potential outcomes. If you are comparing your current situation to how much money you had in your pocket when you walked into the casino, you will behave differently than if your reference point is your overall wealth level.

This finding suggests some advice for gamblers: You will take less dangerous risks if you acquire the mental habit of constantly readjusting your reference point. When you’re thinking about when to leave the casino and go home, recall your previously set gambling limit for the night. However, when you are deciding how much to stake on any given bet, think of your current bet as your first bet of the night; remind yourself that the money you lost earlier in the night will not (hopefully!) affect your overall wealth—so it’s silly to think of yourself as being “in the hole.”

The effect of reference points is even more critical for negotiators to understand. In a negotiation, you are not the only one who can manipulate reference points—the other side can, too. If you entered a negotiation imagining that you would extract millions of dollars from the deal, but now it looks as if the ZOPA is much smaller (and you stand to gain only thousands), you may find yourself adopting a loss frame that makes you risk seeking! You may become more aggressive, more likely to issue an ultimatum, and more willing to walk away from the deal. If, instead, you came in expecting to make very little, you will be pleasantly surprised and will adopt a gain frame that makes you risk averse. You will probably become more conciliatory, make less aggressive demands, and be less willing to risk an impasse. Clearly, the two frames lead to very different behaviors—but should they? The value of the deal hasn’t changed across these situations. Your strategy shouldn’t, either.

Understanding the effects of framing and reference points can help you anticipate their powerful consequences and strategize accordingly. In particular,

 we recommend the following steps:

Consider the various reference points that you could be using to evaluate the situation—including the status quo, your aspirations, your expectations, your feared outcome, and so on—and then pick the one that seems most appropriate.

Evaluate whether your strategy would still make sense if you were to use a different reference point.

Anytime you are considering the use of a risky strategy (such as making an ultimatum or pursuing litigation), think about whether this strategy still makes sense if you change the frame.

For example, note that in the NHL dispute, the owners were asking the players to accept losses in the form of reductions in their pay level. In effect, this made their previous salary the reference point for the players, putting them in a loss frame. But what if, instead, their reference point had been the percentage of revenue that NHL players receive compared with players in other sports leagues (such as the NBA or the NFL)? Thinking about how they would fare relative to players in other leagues, or how they would fare if they pursued their BATNA, might have resulted in a gain frame for NHL players, which in turn might have mitigated their willingness to risk losing the entire season.

BIASES OF THE MIND, BIASES OF THE HEART

As the behavioral decision research summarized in this chapter reveals, negotiators must contend not only with the tactics of the other party, but also with the predictable mental traps that can cloud their own judgment. In the next chapter, we reveal that cognitive biases are only half of the story; negotiator thought and behavior are also powerfully influenced by motivational biases—the mistakes in judgment that we make because of our strong desire to see ourselves and the world in a particular way. Fortunately, would-be negotiation geniuses can learn to appreciate and compensate for not only the peculiar workings of the mind, but also the powerful influences of the heart.


CHAPTER 5

When Rationality Fails: Biases of the Heart

A few years ago in Manhattan, a dispute arose between residents of one co-op apartment unit and the building’s co-op board. The dispute was over $909. This is the amount that the unit’s residents had spent to install window bars to childproof their apartment. The problem? It was unclear who should be responsible for footing the bill. The residents of the unit argued that the building as a whole should pay for the window bars because this was a safety and liability issue. The co-op board argued that, because the unit’s residents were the only ones who wanted the window bars, they should cover the costs. The dispute escalated and eventually ended up in court.

One year later, the two sides’ combined legal bills exceeded $1,000. This might have been a good time for them to end litigation and to negotiate instead. Yet the parties, both convinced that they would win, continued to litigate.

Another year passed. Now their combined legal bills exceeded $10,000—but the disputants were still unwilling to settle out of court. Their conflict was no longer about the money; it was about the justice that each side felt it deserved.

Finally, the co-op board won the court battle. The residents had to pay for the $909 window bars. Normally, this would be cause for the triumphant party to celebrate. Unfortunately, the ruling came after the litigants had spent close to $20,000 in combined legal costs.

That’s bad. But it gets worse.

The unit’s residents decided to appeal the ruling. The two sides then spent an additional $30,000 on litigation. Ultimately, the appellate court upheld the initial ruling. Now close to $50,000 had been spent on a dispute over $909.

That’s really bad. But it gets worse yet.

The co-op board then sued the unit’s residents to force them to pay the co-op board’s legal fees. The ensuing litigation cost the two parties an additional $50,000. Finally, a judge threw the litigants out of court; the unit’s residents were forced to pay some (but not most) of the co-op board’s legal fees.

The final tally: the window bars dispute, which started with a $909 claim, lasted six years and cost more than $100,000 to resolve.

Not all negotiation errors result from the cognitive biases we discussed in the previous chapter. Emotions can be just as powerful in derailing agreements. Compounding the problem, we human beings are motivated to see ourselves as fairer, kinder, more competent, more generous, more deserving, and more likely to succeed than others. The result of these motivational biases? We tend to make judgments and decisions that are not optimal. In this chapter, we explore a number of motivational biases and their effects on negotiation strategy and outcomes: the problem of conflicting motivations, egocentrism, overconfidence, irrational optimism, the illusion of superiority, self-serving attributions, and regret aversion.

THE PROBLEM OF CONFLICTING MOTIVATIONS

In The Odyssey, Homer’s epic poem, the hero, Ulysses, faced a difficult problem during his long sea voyage. He knew he would soon sail past the Sirens, female “enchanters” who used their beautiful and irresistible singing to lure men to their island—and to their subsequent deaths. No man had been able to listen to—and still resist—the Sirens, whose beach was “piled with boneheaps of men now rotted away.” To protect his crewmen, Ulysses had all of them put wax into their ears to block out the tempting voices of the Sirens. But, desperate to hear the Sire

ns, Ulysses was unwilling to do this to himself. Then again, he also wanted to live. What to do? To solve this dilemma, Ulysses told his men to bind him to the ship with ropes and ordered them not to release him until after they had sailed safely past the Sirens, no matter how much he might beg. The crewmen complied and Ulysses was able to enjoy the Sirens’ song without losing his life.

What is your Sirens’ song? If you are angry with a negotiating counterpart, you may want to do or say something that you know will harm you in the long run. Your statements or actions might end the business relationship, destroy a personal friendship, or get you into trouble with your boss or even with the law. Still, in the heat of the moment, it can be difficult to resist the urge to lash out or retaliate. Similarly, if the other side makes you an attractive offer, you may be so excited that you are tempted to accept right away, though you know it would be smart to try to negotiate a better deal or find a better deal elsewhere. Note that you would not advise a friend to act rashly in either of these two situations—yet, at the time, you might find it hard to do otherwise.

Economist Thomas Schelling argued that each individual behaves like two people: “one who wants clear lungs and long life and another who adores tobacco, or one who wants a lean body and another who wants dessert.” People often face internal negotiations between doing what they want to do versus doing what they think they should do. Usually the type of creative solution that Ulysses developed is unavailable, and negotiators must make a difficult choice. Too often, the want-self dominates the should-self in important real-world negotiations, leading to behavior and outcomes that you later regret. What can be done?

Many negotiation teachers, executives, and other professionals believe that you need to control your want-self in order to maximize your long-term benefits. According to this view, the should-self is more trustworthy than the want-self, and is better at gauging what is best for you.

There is a contrary view. Behavioral decision researcher George Loewenstein argues that gut-level impulsive responses—the responses of the want-self—are ignored at our peril. “Hunger signals the need for nutritional input,” Loewenstein writes, “pain indicates the impingement of some type of potentially harmful environmental factors, and emotions serve a range of interrupting, prioritizing, and energizing functions.” Loewenstein argues that visceral reactions make us aware of issues that we care a great deal about, but that we tend to suppress these reactions because of the desire to be responsible, to be mature, or to otherwise conform to society.

These divergent perspectives simply highlight our dilemma: People who never control their want-selves engage in shortsighted behavior that often creates enormous long-term problems. Conversely, those who always listen to their should-selves ignore the potentially important signals being sent from their want-selves.

Our advice: it is critical for negotiators to anticipate and resolve the conflict between what they want to do versus what they think they should do in advance of an actual negotiation. You will find that your should-self and your want-self are in agreement both before and after the negotiation. The problem only arises during the negotiation; in the heat of the moment, you face strong emotional desires to satisfy your want-self in ways that are inconsistent with what you believe you should do. Luckily, you can often predict the impulsive demands of your want-self and plan accordingly. For example, you might anticipate that the other side will make you angry, that you will want to say yes to an offer immediately, or that you

 will be tempted to behave shortsightedly. The better prepared you are for a negotiation, the less likely is it that you will act on emotional impulses in a way that scuttles your real interests. Thus, once again, we see that preparation is the key to negotiation success.

Think back to the co-op building’s window-bars dispute. What could the disputants have done to resolve the conflict between their desire to “win” through litigation and their desire to minimize economic loss? One smart idea would have been for each disputant to decide, in advance, how much money and time each was willing to spend to try to win the case. If they reached the preset limit, they would end litigation and simply pay for the window bars on their own. It is unlikely that either side would have been willing to budget tens of thousands of dollars on this dispute before the conflict began to escalate. Thus, the pre-negotiation agreement between each side’s want-self and should-self would have likely saved thousands of dollars.

The parties could have also agreed to a one-day arbitration session without attorneys (and to the provision that both sides would give up their rights to appeal the decision). This way, each side could be heard, and each could receive a decision from a neutral party—but without the costs and complexity of the courts.

Yet another way to cope with conflicting internal preferences would be for each party to hand over control of the negotiation process to someone who is less emotionally involved. For example, the co-op residents might have asked a relative to make key decisions regarding whether to hire lawyers, whether to appeal the decision, how much to spend on litigation, and so on. Similarly, the residents of the building would have been better served if non–board members (or board members who were not involved in the initial dispute) were asked to take control of the situation once it had spiraled out of control. This strategy is akin to that used by Ulysses: by giving up your ability to pursue what you want, you can ensure that you will do what you should. (This also explains why keeping little or no junk food in the house may be a good idea for some people who are trying to lose weight. Often, when temptation strikes, the only way to keep yourself from eating what you want is to make it unavailable.)

EGOCENTRISM

Consider these results of a survey conducted by U.S. News & World Report:

• Question: “If someone sues you and you win the case, should he pay your legal costs?”

Percentage of respondents who answered yes: 85 percent

• Question: “If you sue someone and lose the case, should you pay his costs?”

Percentage of respondents who answered yes: 44 percent

What is going on here?

It is hard for any of us to escape egocentrism, or the tendency for our perceptions and expectations to be biased in our favor. Typically, negotiators first decide on a certain interpretation, belief, or outcome that would benefit them—or make them feel good—and then look for ways to justify this preference on the basis of fairness. Thus, when faced with the possibility of having someone else pay for their court costs, people are likely to argue that this would be fair because such a policy discourages frivolous lawsuits and ensures that only the guilty party suffers. When the tables are turned, however, and people are confronted with the possibility of having to pay for someone else’s court costs, they are likely to argue that the ruling could have gone either way, that it is unfair for one party to bear all the costs, and that such a policy discourages legitimate justice seeking. And there is every reason to believe that actual disputants would be even more biased than the survey respondents.

Egocentrism not only afflicts disputants, it abounds within organizations as well. Max once collaborated in the creation of a negotiation simulation that involved two departments of the same corporation. The departments had different strengths: one had higher revenue, and the other had higher profitability. Participants in the simulation were asked to represent one of the departments and then were given either high or low resources from those in top management. What was the response? Participants viewed unequal allocations to be much fairer when their own department received the greater amount, regardless of whether their division was stronger on sales or profits.

As these examples suggest, there are many different ways to think about what is right and wrong (or fair and unfair), and people are resourceful enough to find the justification that best suits their purpose. As we all struggle to view ourselves in the best possible light, we downplay certain factors that should affect our judgments and heighten the importance of other factors; as a result, we can begin to see the exact same phenomenon quite differently from others. Consider the perceptions of Frederick Banting and John Macleod, cowinners of the 1923 Nobel Prize for the discovery of insulin. Both had a bit of an egocentrism problem. Banting contended that his partner, Macleod, had been more of a hindrance than an asset in their research. Meanwhile, in multiple speeches, Macleod forgot to mention that he even had a research partner.

If you think this problem would go away if we liked and cared about the other side, consider this: If you ask a husband and wife to estimate the percentage of household work that they do, and then add up the two percentages, you will get a number that is significantly higher than 100 percent. Both are likely to believe that they do more than is actually the case.

Of course, negative emotions tend to exacerbate the egocentrism bias. Case in point: divorcing couples who are dividing up their shared assets. Even if each spouse claims to want only what is “fair,” it is quite likely that one will ask for 55 percent, while the other tries to claim 65 percent. Egocentrism causes all parties to believe that they deserve more of a shared resource than a neutral adviser would judge as fair; this discrepancy can easily start a conflict that escalates out of control. When someone demands more than you believe is fair, your reaction probably will not be “Gee, we must have different perceptions.” More likely, you will decide that the other person is unethical and trying to cheat you.

Egocentrism is not only common, but also robust and resilient. It can also be extremely costly. We personally know of two companies that have been fighting over a series of legal issues for more than a decade. While both are highly respected in the market and in society, each views the other firm as truly “evil.” Their legal battles have already cost literally hundreds of millions of dollars. At the center of the dispute is a poorly written contract that was drafted many years ago. Our assessment is that this ongoing dispute began with an ambiguous contract and escalated as a result of egocentric interpretations of its ambiguous clauses.

While many of us want to be fair, even well-intentioned people can act in seemingly unethical ways when we are motivated to claim more than we deserve. This doesn’t make us bad, but merely human—and humans make biased judgments. By understanding the egocentrism bias and trying to correct it in our own behavior, we can move from wanting to be fair to actually being fair, and in doing so, make it less likely that we will initiate or escalate disputes and disagreements.

How might we overcome our egocentrism? Negotiation geniuses do so by following the advice of the philosopher John Rawls, who recommends that when you are trying to assess what is fair (regarding allocations, contributions, claiming value, et cetera), try doing so under the “veil of ignorance.” That is, try to imagine what you would believe to be fair if you did not know your role in a given negotiation or dispute.

In other words, what would you believe or decide to be fair if you did not yet know whom you represented in the dispute? By overcoming our own egocentrism in this way, we eliminate a source of conflict in our negotiations. And by understanding the potential for this bias in the behavior of others, we can make more sympathetic and accurate attributions of their intentions.

OVERCONFIDENCE, IRRATIONAL OPTIMISM, AND THE ILLUSION OF SUPERIORITY

In her research, psychologist Shelley Taylor of UCLA has demonstrated that students have unrealistic expectations about their likelihood of graduating at the top of the class, getting a good job, obtaining a high salary, enjoying their first job, getting written up in the newspaper, and giving birth to a gifted child. They also assume that they are less likely than their classmates to become alcoholics, be fired, divorce, become depressed, or suffer physical problems. [12] Confidence in our negotiation ability tends to be similarly inflated: Rod Kramer of the Stanford Business School found that 68 percent of the MBA students in his negotiation class predicted that their bargaining outcomes would fall in the upper 25 percent of the class. [13] These MBA students also had positive, distorted expectations regarding their ability to learn more than their peers and add more to the class experience. More generally, overconfidence in our abilities and irrational optimism regarding our fate lead most of us to believe that our futures will be better and brighter than those of other people.

Why is this a problem? When a football team is running a play, it helps if the quarterback has as much confidence as possible. Similarly, when a salesperson is selling a product, it helps if she believes that the product is fantastic. Indeed, many social psychologists view positive illusions regarding our abilities and our future as evolutionarily adaptive. [14] According to this view, these illusions contribute to our psychological and material well-being by protecting our self-esteem and helping us persevere when faced with difficult tasks. In addition, overconfidence and irrational optimism can help us cope with negative life events. Undoubtedly, they also help to motivate the kind of risk-taking that creates entrepreneurs. Psychologist Martin Seligman goes as far as to recommend that firms base their selection of salespeople on the magnitude of their positive illusions—what he calls learned optimism. [15]

However, we take a contrarian position when it comes to negotiation. Overconfidence may help the quarterback execute a practiced play and the salesperson deliver a rehearsed pitch, but when you are making decisions, including decisions about your negotiation strategy, you need to take off the rose-tinted glasses. Unrealistic optimism can lead you to turn down the best job offer that you are likely to receive, reject an offer on your house when no better offer is forthcoming, and to hold out for contract terms that your counterpart is unlikely to accept. Overoptimistic negotiators are also likely to enter into negotiations with only one strategy for reaching agreement or resolving the dispute; they assume that their negotiation plan will work, and they devote all of their energy to developing and executing this one strategy. A more realistic negotiator realizes that an initial strategy may not work and is ready with a contingency plan.

We can also see the effects of overconfidence and irrational optimism away from the negotiating table. Too many people invest their life savings in new businesses that have little chance of success. Too many employees assume that they are indispensable to their organization, and are caught off guard when they are laid off or fired. Others apply for too few jobs because they believe falsely—and contrary to all available objective evidence—that they are great potential hires. And far too many people take their disputes to court, believing falsely that they have an airtight case—or at least a “very strong” case—a belief that many lawyers are more than happy to help you maintain. Would the litigants in the co-op dispute over window bars have been so willing to go to court if they had accurate, objective assessments of their likelihood of prevailing, of the costs associated with litigation, and of the time it would take to complete the process? Not likely.

Why, then, are positive illusions useful for

 quarterbacks and salespeople? Because, unlike negotiators, they are not making decisions so much as they are implementing decisions that have already been made. Overconfidence and irrational optimism may well provide them with the motivation and inspiration they need to improve their performance—at relatively low cost. But such illusions are extremely costly for negotiators, who must make decisions constantly—before, during, and after the negotiation.

Negotiators not only see their future prospects as better than they actually are, they also see themselves as better than a realistic assessment would suggest. This illusion of superiority leads people to view themselves as more flexible, competent, rational, honest, fair, and cooperative than their opponents. [16] One unfortunate result of this illusion of superiority is that far too many mediocre negotiators do not recognize the need to improve their inferior negotiation skills.

Interestingly, the illusion of superiority not only affects our self-judgments, but also our judgments regarding the groups to which we belong. We tend to view members of our group—whether our country, our firm, our department, or our family—as more honest, cooperative, trustworthy, diligent, and industrious than members of other groups. [17] If we believe that our fellow group members are above average, then how do we view our adversaries and opponents? In independent studies, management researchers Kristina Diekmann and Ann Tenbrunsel found that while MBA students rate themselves above the mean of their class on a variety of positive attributes, they rate their negotiation opponents below the mean. [18]

The tendency to denigrate our opponents and adversaries can be quite detrimental to negotiation success. If you view your opponent as uncooperative, unfair, or untrustworthy, you are less likely to share information with them—and hence less likely to create value. In addition, negotiators who think they are smarter, better prepared, or more honest than others often devalue or ignore the ideas and proposals of their counterparts. Doing so can decrease the likelihood of reaching efficient agreements and increase the likelihood of conflict.

SELF-SERVING ATTRIBUTIONS

Egocentrism, overconfidence, irrational optimism, and the illusion of superiority exist because we are motivated to see the world and ourselves in a positive light. But why do such biases persist? Why don’t we learn from our experience and adjust our beliefs about our contributions, our abilities, and our likelihood of success? The answer is that, even as we try to learn from our experiences, we tend to evaluate the past in self-protective ways: the stories we tell ourselves, and the attributions that we make about ourselves and others, are the kind that will keep us feeling good about ourselves.

John F. Kennedy once said, “Victory has a thousand fathers, but defeat is an orphan.” [19] This is certainly true of negotiators: we are quick to take credit for success and deny responsibility for failures. When negotiators are asked to explain their successful results, they usually give personalized internal reasons—e.g., the skill, perseverance, or creativity with which they handled the situation. In contrast, when asked about a failure, most negotiators cite external reasons: the difficult context in which they were negotiating, the incompetence of the other side, or plain bad luck. [20] One serious problem with this tendency is that external attributions for failure inhibit learning from experience.

Negotiators are even more likely to distort their beliefs regarding their shortcomings when their adversaries are more successful than they are. [21] For example, business school students who perform less well in negotiation simulations and exercises are more likely to attribute the success of other students to uncooperative and unethical bargaining tactics and to rate them as excessively competitive and self-interested. [22] What happens when we view successful others as unethical or hypercompetitive? First,

 we will not try to learn from them. Also, to the extent possible, we will avoid negotiating with them. Finally, when we have no choice but to negotiate with them, we will find it easy to justify our own unethical behavior.

This self-serving attitude can also be triggered when our “in-group” negotiates with an “out-group.” For example, when two firms meet to negotiate the terms of a deal, both sides will inevitably need to make concessions. When our firm (the in-group) makes a concession, it is because we are being generous or because we are smart enough to understand the need for logrolling. When the other side (the out-group) makes a concession, it is because they have seen the wisdom of our argument or because they have no other choice!

Why is this problematic? Because when we attribute the cooperation of others to the constraints of the situation (e.g., their legal obligations or the mandates of a contract), rather than to their goodwill or integrity, it becomes difficult to build trust. [23] To build trust, negotiators need to see the cooperative actions of others as behaviors that they have chosen, not behaviors that they were unable to avoid. And, in the absence of trust, negotiators become reluctant to make concessions, share information, or take the risks inherent in building mutually rewarding relationships.

Negotiation geniuses understand the value of building trust with their negotiation partners, even in competitive or adversarial environments, and so seek to accurately gauge the reasons for others’ behavior. Negotiation geniuses understand that mistaking a kind gesture for weakness is no more helpful than mistaking miscommunication for malice. And so they take the time necessary to understand the behavior of others before they react.

REGRET AVERSION

Imagine that you are an Olympic athlete. Which would you rather win: a silver medal or a bronze medal? Few people (if any) would prefer a bronze.

Now, which medal makes actual Olympic athletes happier, silver or bronze? As it turns out, Olympians are happier when they win bronze than when they win silver! Three clever psychologists, Vicki Medvec, Scott Madey, and Tom Gilovich demonstrated this phenomenon by having viewers watch video footage of various Olympic athletes as they received their medals. [24] The viewers were then asked to rate the facial expressions of the athletes. Because sound was eliminated from the footage and the medals were not shown, viewers could not know which medal had been presented. The result? Bronze-medal winners appeared much happier to the viewers than did silver-medal winners. Why might this be?

Once again, we see the power of reference points, or the comparisons we make to other potential outcomes that are salient to us. And what could be more salient than the “what-might-have-been” scenario? It seems that bronze-medal winners—who were close to winning no medal at all—are thrilled simply to be medal winners. Meanwhile, silver-medal winners—who were close to winning the gold—are disappointed not to have come in first. Objectively, they have achieved more, but they experience greater regret.

Because regret is such a painful psychological state, people try to avoid situations that might cause it. If you got a B+ in class and you could not change your grade through negotiation, would you really want to know how many points you were shy of receiving an A? If you were on a game show and failed to win the grand prize, would you really want to know what that prize would have been? If you were bidding in a sealed-bid auction, would you rather find out that you were the second-highest bidder (and almost won) or that you were the fifth-highest bidder (and were not close to winning)? In negotiation, would you want to accept an

 offer that you might later find out was not the best one you could have received? In fact, research shows that negotiators often contort their decisions to avoid facing any clear evidence that would cause regret. [25] Furthermore, we tend to feel greater regret about acts of commission (what we did do) than about acts of omission (what we did not do). [26]

This desire to avoid regretful decisions can induce negotiators to hold out longer—and for more—than they reasonably should. Again, consider the litigants in the co-op dispute. After having spent thousands of dollars, they would almost certainly view the decision to end litigation (and pay for the window bars) with a high degree of regret. “What might have happened if I’d persevered just a little longer?” they are likely to wonder. If “what might have been” will actually be revealed in the future, our decisions often become even more geared toward avoiding regret. For example, the seller of a house may reject reasonable offers in the belief that prices in the area could go up after the sale. Likewise, an investor may hold on to a seemingly weak stock too long out of fear that the stock price will go up shortly after he places his “sell” order.

Too many negotiators place too much emphasis on what might have been. The fact is, uncertainty is a fact of life; in hindsight, we will often see results that we could not have predicted in advance. While such hindsight can drive us crazy, the solution is not to ignore it. The way to leverage hindsight—without overemphasizing it—is to focus on what can be learned from the past about how to make better negotiation decisions in the future. If thinking about “what might have been” helps us improve our future negotiation behaviors, we should analyze the past carefully. If our regrets could only have been avoided with a crystal ball, then we should remind ourselves that if we make good decisions most of the time, our net outcomes in life will be good as well.

TOWARD DE-BIASING

As you’ve probably recognized, this chapter is as much about the human condition as it is about negotiation. It’s important to remember that even highly educated, intelligent people who have a desire to be fair and objective are susceptible to psychological biases. We are biased because we are human, not because we are mean or stupid. This means that we need to be vigilant in our efforts to overcome our biases. It also means that we should be more understanding of the biases exhibited by others—and that we may even want to help others overcome them. The following chapter shows you how.

CHAPTER 6

Negotiating Rationally in an Irrational World

Biases of the heart and mind affect even the best and brightest. You may have superb people skills and great instincts for when to push and when to hold back, but your intuition will not protect you from the kind of systematic and predictable errors we have been documenting. Neither, surprisingly, will extensive experience. While experience can be valuable, experience without a clear understanding of potential negotiation pitfalls can be dangerous.

Our own experience teaching tens of thousands of executive students suggests that people trust their intuition and their experience. But learning from experience alone can be a disastrous mistake for executives.[1] The problem is that people who are extraordinarily successful—or lucky—tend to conclude from their "experience" that they are invulnerable. This belief leads them to insufficiently monitor or correct their own behavior and to overgeneralize their experience from one context to another. But consider the fact that many people are very good at negotiating in one domain but not in others. Someone may be great at negotiating sales contracts but suffer from constant conflict in his personal life. A person may know how to negotiate mergers and strategic alliances but be lousy at negotiating her compensation package. Why? Because a negotiator can have significant experience in one domain yet lack a thorough understanding of what she does well. As a result, she cannot generalize her experience—and success—to another context.

Our skeptical view of the value of experience grows out of extensive evidence that psychological biases afflict even highly trained and experienced professionals of all kinds, including investors, analysts, real-estate agents, medical doctors, politicians, and so on. Margaret Neale and Greg Northcraft, who are leading scholars of organizational behavior, argue that such biases can be overcome—not through the development of experience but through the development of expertise.[2] According to Neale and Northcraft, individuals gain experience when they conduct a similar type of negotiation many times; by contrast, they develop expertise when they form a "strategic conceptualization" of what constitutes effective negotiation. This view of expertise is closely aligned with our view of negotiation genius. To overcome bias and negotiate effectively, you need a framework for thinking about, preparing for, and executing negotiations systematically and strategically. When it comes to biases, negotiation geniuses are aware of their limitations—and those of others—and work vigilantly to address them.

This chapter offers you the tools and framework you need to overcome your own biases and to effectively confront the biases of your negotiation counterparts. It is not enough to anticipate your own decision biases; you must also set up systems and processes that will help you overcome them. Similarly, you cannot always benefit from the mistakes your counterpart makes; sometimes, to improve your own outcomes, you need to help them overcome their own irrationality.

CONFRONTING YOUR OWN BIASES

Three powerful strategies can help you confront and manage your own biases in negotiation: using "System 2" thinking, applying analogical reasoning, and adopting the "outsider" lens.

STRATEGY 1: USE "SYSTEM 2" THINKING

What accounts for the difference between the times when we are susceptible to cognitive and motivational biases and the times when we think and behave rationally? One important answer lies in the distinction between "System 1" and "System 2" thinking, as proposed by researchers Keith Stanovich and R. F. West.[3] System 1, which corresponds to intuition, is typically fast, automatic, effortless, implicit, and emotional; we make most decisions in life using System 1 thinking. The biases described in Chapters 4 and 5 are also much more common when we are using System 1. By contrast, System 2 corresponds to reasoned thought and is slower, conscious, effortful, explicit, and logical.[

4] When we are facing time pressures, we are more likely to use System 1. In other words, busy professionals are likely to rely on System 1 thinking most of the time—and more often than they should.[5]

This does not mean that a full System 2 process is necessary for every decision that you make. If you are buying groceries in the supermarket, responding to unimportant emails, or driving to work, System 1 will suit you fine. Ideally, however, System 2 thinking should influence your most important decisions and negotiations. (Of course, in the early stages of practicing to become a negotiation genius, it might be useful to stay in System 2 for even more mundane negotiations.) As a negotiator, you need to learn to identify situations in which you should move from the intuitively compelling System 1 to the more logical System 2. How can you do this?

The following negotiation techniques can help facilitate System 2 thinking in an otherwise System 1 world:

Make a System 2 list: At the beginning of each month or year, make a list of all of the upcoming negotiations that you think should be subject to System 2 thinking. These might be negotiations in which you are dealing with high stakes, complex issues, multiple parties, high-priority clients, or high degrees of uncertainty. Having planned in advance to be more prepared for and engaged in these negotiations will help you to allocate your time more appropriately. It will also help you think more carefully about when you should schedule these negotiations and will remind you to actively participate in the pre-negotiation discussions that will set the agenda for substantive negotiations; there is nothing worse than having a negotiation thrust upon you when you are not ready for it.

Avoid negotiating under time pressure: System 1 thinking takes over when we have little time and are feeling rushed. Smart negotiators anticipate this problem and avoid negotiating under time pressure, or at least recognize when the pressure is real versus when it is artificially created as a negotiation tactic. To avoid time pressure, instead of negotiating during a one-hour lunch, set aside an entire afternoon. If someone initiates substantive discussions with an unexpected phone call or visit, and you are unprepared, politely ask to reschedule the conversation for a later time or date. Some negotiators are extremely fond of forcing others to negotiate, make commitments, or respond to requests under immense time pressure. Unfortunately, many people fall prey to this tactic because they are worried about losing the deal or offending the other party. How should you respond to such tactics? In the vast majority of cases, there is little reason not to postpone your negotiation or decision—at least for a little while. Unless the other party has given you specific, credible information that time truly is of the essence, you should avoid giving in to their pressure tactics. This comes back to the principle (discussed in Chapter 1) of separating information from influence. For example, if a potential employer extends you a job offer and tells you that "we will need your answer by Friday"—and this does not give you enough time to make a wise decision—it is okay to probe a bit and find out whether this is a serious ultimatum. After articulating your gratitude and enthusiasm for the opportunity to work for the company, you might add a query such as one of these:

• "Is this a firm deadline?"

• "If, for personal reasons, I needed more time to make this decision, what would be the process for doing so?"

Partition the negotiation across multiple sessions: You do not have to complete an entire negotiation in one session. No matter how prepared you are, in most complex negotiations, you will encounter information, issues, and tactics that you did not anticipate. If you want to avoid falling back on System 1 thinking at such times

, you will need to structure a process that allows you to rethink or re-strategize as needed. For example, you might schedule breaks every hour or two so that you can spend time evaluating and organizing everything that you heard that was unexpected. Or you might negotiate over multiple days, such that you exchange preliminary information over email on Day 1, have an initial telephone discussion on Day 2, and set aside time on Days 3 and 4 for substantive negotiations. This will give you the time you need to apply System 2 thinking throughout the negotiation process.

STRATEGY 2: LEARN THROUGH THE USE OF ANALOGIES

It is often said that we learn more from our mistakes and failures than we do from our successes. If this is true, then negotiators should be able to learn from the negative consequences of their decision biases and to adjust their subsequent behavior accordingly. However, it is often quite difficult for negotiators to learn from past mistakes; we tend to fall prey to the same biases time and time again.[6] Why? In the real world, where negotiation outcomes are determined by a host of factors, it can be difficult to assess whether a mistake was due to flawed strategy or to misfortune. Even if you acknowledge that your strategy was to blame, you may be uncertain which aspect of the strategy was flawed.

How, then, can negotiators maximize their learning from experience? People learn far more from an example, case study, exercise, or real-world experience when they are able to extract an abstract principle from it.[7] In other words, it does negotiators little good if they are told in retrospect how they should have behaved in a specific situation they recently encountered, but it is very useful for them to discover what factors to consider when facing similar situations in the future. Because no two situations are identical, negotiators are better off extracting the correct principle from past experience rather than the correct answer. The key is to figure out how to draw principles out of experiences and examples.

One way to do this is to apply analogical reasoning—the conscious comparison of different situations on dimensions that are similar. Extensive research has shown the power of this approach.

In studies by psychologists Jeffrey Loewenstein, Leigh Thompson, and Dedre Gentner, participants were provided with summaries of two complex negotiation problems that had the same underlying lesson (i.e., the same type of solution to the negotiator's problem). Half of the participants were asked to explain what lesson they had learned, one exercise at a time. The other half was asked how the two exercises were related and what lessons they had in common. Negotiators were much more able to draw out the critical lesson—and to overcome similar problems in their own subsequent negotiations—when they had been asked to compare the two exercises. In short, when we try to learn from one experience at a time, we too often focus on "surface" elements of the situation, whereas the process of comparing and contrasting different experiences helps us draw out similar "structural" elements.

Consider, for example, an executive who is reflecting on the recent dissolution of a business partnership. He might conclude that negotiating such dissolutions is very difficult and requires third-party mediation. Though intuitively appealing, this lesson may be minimally useful. It is also possible for partnerships to be dissolved without severe conflict, in which case the lesson is simply wrong. In contrast, another executive who reflects on multiple prior negotiations might conclude that, whatever the underlying situation, nonrational escalation of commitment is more likely when lawyers are involved and when emotions are running high. This executive might decide to bring in a third party to mediate whenever she encounters such conditions—a far more useful conclusion.

How can you use analogical reasoning to your advantage in negotiation? Try the following techniques:

Debrief multiple negotiations simultaneously:

 Negotiation geniuses make it a habit to review important negotiations after they are completed. Better yet, you should review multiple negotiations at the same time. As you are doing this, ask yourself how the negotiations were similar and how they were different. Having other members of your team or organization help you to think critically about your experiences, strategies, and outcomes may be especially useful because they will be able to weigh in with their own experiences as well.

When firms hire us to train their employees in negotiation, we often conduct a "group-debrief" exercise, in which we set up groups of four to six people. Each employee is asked to discuss a recent or current negotiation situation, then all members of the group try to extract important lessons and insights from the various experiences. This exercise is extremely effective at promoting learning because it encourages negotiators to make comparisons across negotiations and form analogies.

Focus on the principles, not particulars: When reviewing past negotiations, try to understand the structural and conceptual aspects of what occurred. Rather than focusing on the uniqueness of the specific negotiation situation, dissect your recent experience into elements that map onto the negotiation concepts described in this book. While all negotiations are unique, they all have BATNAs, reservation values, ZOPAs, underlying interests, information exchange, and so on. Examining these concepts will help you better generalize learning from recently completed negotiations to the future.

STRATEGY 3: ADOPT THE OUTSIDER LENS

Why are we so overconfident in our own judgments and abilities but more accurate in our assessments of the likely success of others? Daniel Kahneman and Dan Lovallo explain this inconsistency by arguing that people make decisions using two different perspectives, or "lenses": an insider lens and an outsider lens.[8] A negotiator usually adopts the insider lens when making judgments while immersed in the context or situation. By contrast, we usually adopt the outsider lens when removed or detached from the situation. The outsider lens is the cleaner lens. Obviously, it is better to use the cleaner lens than the dirty one; unfortunately, the outsider lens is typically not the default option when we are engaged in negotiation or embroiled in conflict. Thus, a negotiator might well be aware that the time it takes to go from an initial sales pitch to a signed contract is six to twelve weeks, yet still believe that he can close the deal within three weeks. More dangerously, the negotiator is likely to continue being overconfident despite having been proven wrong in the past. This is because the insider lens tends to focus on only the current situation, while the outsider lens is better at integrating information across multiple episodes.

Consider the case of homeowners negotiating with a contractor about building a new house. The homeowners know from their friends that such projects typically end up being 20–50 percent over budget and take much longer to complete than originally planned (the outsider view). Yet most homeowners believe that their experience will be different—that their home will be completed on time and close to the projected cost (the insider view). As a result of their poor planning, they end up needing to get last-minute financing for cost overruns, to give up features that they really wanted, and to scrounge for a place to live because the house is not yet ready for them to move in.

Nobel Laureate Kahneman tells his own story about the insider lens. Kahneman was working with a group of colleagues on defining a new curriculum and writing a book to encapsulate it.[9] The curriculum team estimated that the project would take eighteen to thirty months to complete. Kahneman approached a member of the team, a distinguished expert in curriculum design, and asked the following question: "We are surely not the only team to have tried to develop a curriculum for a new area of study.

 Please try to recall as many cases as you can. Think of them as they were in a stage comparable to ours at present. How long did it take them, from that point, to complete their project?" Having adopted the outsider perspective, the curriculum design expert said that the minimum completion time was seven years and that 40 percent of the projects were never completed. In fact, it ended up taking Kahneman's team eight years to finish the project!

Surely, would-be entrepreneurs should decide whether to go into business using the outsider lens—with a realistic understanding of the risks involved—rather than using the more tempting insider lens. Yet, in one study, more than 80 percent of entrepreneurs viewed their personal chances of success to be 70 percent or higher, and one-third of them described their success as certain. This is clearly the insider speaking. The outsider can easily find out that the five-year survival rate for new businesses is only about 33 percent! Why would smart and motivated individuals be willing to stake large sums of money, their reputations, and years of their lives on a decision made using the biased insider lens? As we discussed in Chapter 5, people have a strong urge to see the world and themselves in a positive light, a tendency that can have powerful effects on decision-making.

The insider-outsider distinction leads us to another set of techniques that you can use to de-bias your judgment. Consider the following:

1. Bring in an outsider: When preparing for an important negotiation, bring an outsider to the preparation session. This may mean reaching out to experts within your firm, hiring a consultant with unique expertise, or talking to a friend. Remember that you are more likely to anticipate cost overruns when a friend is having her house built than when your own home is being built. When it comes to your own house, you anticipate that things will turn out better for you than a rational analysis would suggest. The same is true when you negotiate a deal. Others will see factors that you have ignored, weigh negative information more appropriately than you do, and preserve an objective view of the situation in ways that are difficult for you to do.

2. Take the outsider perspective: It is often equally effective—and less costly—to ask yourself how you would assess a situation if you were not immersed in it. This might require you to think back to a time when someone else was faced with a similar situation or to collect data on what you can rationally expect in the current situation (e.g., data on industry averages). Or you might ask yourself this simple question: if someone I cared about asked me for advice in a negotiation such as this, what advice would I give?

Collectively, using System 2 thinking, applying analogical reasoning, and adopting the outsider lens are viable strategies for reducing the likelihood that decision biases will sabotage your next negotiation. If you are serious about becoming a negotiation genius, you must make the use of these strategies habitual. Too often, executives who attend negotiation courses (or read negotiation books) discover interesting ideas but do not actually change their behavior. Gathering information is not enough. Real change requires you to "unfreeze" existing decision-making processes, understand the ideas and techniques that will help you make the desired change, and then "refreeze" the new ideas and techniques into your thoughts and behavior. In other words, you must become aware of biases, consider how to avoid or overcome them, and work hard to integrate new and more effective strategies into your habitual approach to negotiation.

CONFRONTING THE BIASES OF OTHERS

The biases that others bring to the table can have serious implications for your negotiated outcomes. In the remainder of the chapter, we explore how to incorporate an understanding of the biases of others into your strategy, why and how to help others be less biased, why and how to adjust the information you receive from others, and how to respond to the other party’s decision biases through contracting.

STRATEGY 1: INCORPORATE THE CONSEQUENCES OF THEIR BIASES IN YOUR STRATEGY

General managers of baseball teams spend a great deal of time deciding how to evaluate the talent they are considering acquiring and deciding with whom to negotiate a contract. Billy Beane, the general manager of the Oakland

 Athletics, found a way to do this better than anyone else—and succeeded in transforming his team from losers to winners. From 1999–2002, with a very limited budget, Beane led the Athletics to the second-best record in Major League Baseball (MLB). The team’s players earned, on average, less than a third of the amount earned by the New York Yankees. Yet, during this four-year period, they still won more games than the Yankees.

How did Beane accomplish this amazing feat? By studying the mistakes of other baseball managers and, with the help of a recent Harvard economics graduate, Paul DePodesta, using this knowledge to develop wiser negotiation strategies. In his book Moneyball, Michael Lewis argues that other MLB managers were consistently guilty of three systematic mistakes that Beane and DePodesta were able to identify and exploit: 1) they overgeneralized from their personal experiences, 2) they were overly influenced by players’ recent performances, and 3) they were overly influenced by what they had personally seen, even though players’ multiyear records provided far better data. In other words, most baseball managers were relying on System 1 thinking.

Beane and DePodesta decided instead to look at the hard data. They found that players drafted out of high school were much less likely to succeed than players drafted out of college. Yet, baseball executives systematically overvalued high-school players and systematically undervalued college players. Armed with this knowledge, Beane stopped drafting players out of high school. In addition, Beane and DePodesta learned that certain players had a dramatically higher tendency than others to be “walked,” but that baseball professionals inappropriately undervalued this data.

At the simplest level, the success of Beane and DePodesta’s approach reveals that the use of systematic and rigorous analysis can be superior to the System 1 thinking on which many experienced negotiators rely. But much more was actually happening: Beane and DePodesta used their understanding of the decision biases of others to make trades with other teams. In doing so, they were able to get players who were more successful in exchange for players who would be less successful. Thus, they combined their System 2 thinking with an understanding of the consequences of the other side’s System 1 thinking to make value-creating trades.

The lesson for negotiators? Use your System 2 thinking, but be ready to adapt to the other side’s System 1 mistakes. If someone is obsessed with selling his company at a certain price point (perhaps because a broker mentioned a high number or because a sibling sold her company for that amount), recognize the vividness of that number to him. Then, rather than fight it, see if you can creatively meet this vivid need. How? Offer the desired number in exchange for concessions on other issues that you value highly. For example, you might have him throw in related real estate or accept better financing terms. Indeed, too many negotiators focus excessively on salient dollar figures. If the other side will accept “not a penny less than $40 million,” he may still accept $40 million paid to him over a very long period of time. When you start thinking about the decision biases of others, you can custom-design negotiation strategies that adapt to their errors.

STRATEGY 2: HELP OTHERS BE LESS BIASED

Our students often ask us, “Would you rather negotiate with a good negotiator or a bad negotiator?” Our answer is simple: we’d rather negotiate with good negotiators; bad negotiators will usually just get in the way of good deals. Unfortunately, many people falsely assume that bargaining with an incompetent or irrational (i.e., biased) partner gives them a valuable competitive advantage. While this is sometimes true (

as the Moneyball example shows), biased negotiators also have tremendous potential for entirely derailing the negotiation. For example, if your counterpart is overconfident, she might wait for deals that you can never give her. If he irrationally escalates commitment to a course of action, he may become overly competitive and unwilling to compromise. If she is afflicted with the fixed-pie bias, she may refuse to share information and thus eliminate opportunities to create value. In these cases, the other party’s biases hurt not only their own interests but also yours.

For these reasons, it is often in your best interest to help your counterpart think more clearly. How can you promote careful, reasoned, and systematic thinking? Consider again that negotiators tend to be far more biased under time pressure than when they have time to think through a proposal or idea. Thus, when you have provided the other side with an offer that you believe to be better than your competitor’s proposal, give him time to think it through rather than pushing for an immediate answer. Under pressure, negotiators who are overconfident in their ability to get a better deal often say no when they should say yes. If you are confident that you are offering more than he can get elsewhere, you’d be wise to encourage him to explore alternatives and get back to you after comparing your offer with others.

Most of us also assume that we want the other side to be less prepared. However, ill-prepared negotiators typically want to bargain over one issue at a time and to withhold information. They are also less able than prepared negotiators to evaluate or propose multi-issue (package) deals. All of these behaviors inhibit value creation. When dealing with an ill-prepared negotiator, encourage her to think through the relative importance of each issue to her. In addition, take the lead in negotiating multiple issues simultaneously and in making package offers—and encourage her to do the same. It is also important that you clarify for her that you value some issues more than others and that you are happy to jointly explore mutually beneficial trade-offs.

Finally, the best thing you can do to help an ill-prepared negotiator (and to help yourself) is to encourage her to be more prepared. If the negotiation is not going smoothly, you might suggest that both parties would benefit from thinking more about the issues that have surfaced during the recent discussion. You might then create a timeline with the other party that includes milestones that encourage preparation and the sharing of information. For example, you might agree that, after one week, each of you will send an email that lists your top priorities and concerns; after three more days, one of you will be responsible for making an initial package proposal; then, after the other party has a few days to consider this proposal, both parties will meet for further substantive discussions. While most people believe that giving the other party this much time to prepare is dangerous, a negotiation genius recognizes that your counterpart can only make wise trades, expand the pie, and accept your creative offers if she knows what she values—and that such knowledge requires preparation. So, the next time you run into a well-prepared negotiator, you should be encouraged about the potential to create an excellent agreement rather than nervous about being exploited or outperformed.

STRATEGY 3: CALIBRATE INFORMATION PROVIDED BY OTHERS

Imagine that you are moving to a new city and that you have interviewed a number of real estate agents about selling your current home. While you want your agent to be a good salesperson, you also want him or her to provide an accurate estimate of your house’s value. Unless you know how much your home will realistically sell for, you cannot be certain how expensive a home you can afford in your new location. Here is a dilemma that might arise. The agents know that

 you desire a high sales price and that providing you with a high estimate (within certain limits) will make you more likely to hire them. Unfortunately, the more inflated their estimates, the less accurate they could be, and the worse off you will be when assessing which new home to purchase.

How can you identify whether an agent is being overly optimistic and trying to pass on that optimism to you? Try this: instead of negotiating with one agent, ask four different agents for their opinions on the appropriate listing price. Then ask each agent to bring you computer printouts of the original listing prices of the last ten houses they sold as well as the final selling price of each of these ten homes. This is information that is readily available to them. (To verify the accuracy of the data they provide, you can even ask the agents to cross-check each other.) Armed with the agents’ recommendations for your home and also the data on historic differences between their listing prices and sales prices, you are in a far better position to estimate the true worth of your own house. You also have the data you need to hire the best agent of the bunch—the one who is not only selling high but also is more realistic (or more truthful).

Undoubtedly, you’d choose different data in other types of negotiations. Imagine that you are an executive of a retail organization and that a group of regional managers reports to you. Each regional manager is in charge of roughly one-eighth of the country. You are meeting to negotiate the region-specific advertising budgets for the coming year. As the meeting begins, the managers of last year’s two most successful regions suggest to you that the available resources should be allocated in proportion to last year’s sales. They argue that last year’s sales are the best predictor of next year’s sales and that sales are a good indicator of where advertising will be most effective. What is wrong with this logic?

First, some regions will have higher sales than other regions regardless of advertising (for example, you will sell more snow shovels in the northern than in the southern United States). Thus, the managers may be choosing the “appropriate measure of success” self-servingly. If so, perhaps you should ask each manager instead to report on an analysis of the marginal impact of advertising dollars on increases in sales over the past ten years. A second problem with their logic is that it fails to account for the fact that many outcomes “regress to the mean” over time. Fantastic students frequently have less successful younger siblings. Extremely tall parents tend to have children that are shorter than them. Spectacular rookies tend to have mediocre second years (the “sophomore jinx”). And regions that have just had a fantastic year will tend to perform less well the next year. Why? Because every successful outcome is due in part to the factor you suspect (skill, advertising dollars, genetics, etc.) and in part due to chance (or unknown factors). Furthermore, extremely successful outcomes are likely to be high on both of these factors. Unfortunately, you cannot count on chance to work strongly in your favor every year. Thus, you need to adjust your estimates downward. Regression to the mean does not mean that the past has no predictability for the future. Rather, it means that the past may predict the future less reliably than we assume.

Armed with an understanding of these biases, the executive is better prepared to negotiate with the regional managers—and to expect that the two high-performing regions from last year may continue to perform above the mean but not necessarily by the same amount as the previous year. The key lesson: thinking about the decision biases of others allows you to calibrate, quantitatively and qualitatively, the information, data, and arguments that you hear from them.

STRATEGY 4: USE CONTINGENCY CONTRACTS TO RESOLVE CONFLICTS STEMMING FROM BIASES

“Curing” your negotiation counterpart’s biases is not always the answer. Your opponent may be extremely confident about his view of the future, while you are confident that he is wrong. Rather than arguing the point, it sometimes pays to leverage the other side’s biased expectations. How? Using a contingency contract. In Chapters 1 and 2, we discussed the use of contingency contracts, which allow both sides in a negotiation to bet on their beliefs about the future. When you know that the other side is biased, you can draft a contract that allows him to bet on the information that you believe to be inaccurate. In doing so, you make a bet that you expect to be favorable to you and costly to your counterpart.

Suppose that a salesperson claims that her product is measurably better than that of her competitor. You are fairly sure that her claim doesn’t apply to your intended use of the product, and you don’t want to run the risk of being disappointed if the product performs at less than her expectations. Instead of calling the salesperson a liar or trying to disprove her claim, propose a contingency contract instead. Specifically, offer to pay her asking price if the product performs at the level she promises, but insist upon a very large discount if it fails to meet her targeted performance level. If she has been overselling intentionally, she will back away from your proposal. But if she is simply overconfident, she’ll say yes, and you’ll get a very good deal. Of course, if it turns out that she is right, you will end up paying more—but for a better product than you expected. You will also find out that she is better informed and more credible than you believed.

MOVING FORWARD

Many smart people are faced with situations in which they are suspicious of another negotiator’s decision-making process but lack the vocabulary to articulate the flaws in the other side’s logic. In Chapters 4–6, we’ve summarized clearly defined and rigorously researched concepts to help you recognize and understand the biases you confront. If you would like to practice spotting others’ biases, you need simply to read the newspaper or watch a sporting event on television. Journalists, politicians, sportscasters, and other “expert” information providers constantly make statements that exemplify the biased decision-making processes that we have outlined. But they are not the only ones who are biased. The worst mistake you can make right now is to think that you have just read three chapters that explain to you how others are biased.

Negotiation geniuses do not assume that they are immune from bias. Rather, they accept the fact that their intuition, like that of other smart people, is fundamentally flawed. They attempt to reduce the degree to which they are affected by biases and, when necessary, adopt more systematic decision processes to avoid bias. In addition, rather than expecting rationality from their counterparts, negotiation geniuses anticipate bias in others and use the strategies we have highlighted to respond to these biases.

Taken together, Parts I and II of this book (Chapters 1–6) should provide you with the tools you need to negotiate more effectively in the wide variety of negotiation contexts that you will encounter. In Part III, we will build on this knowledge and equip you to handle even the most difficult and complex negotiations.


CHAPTER 11

Negotiating from a Position of Weakness

One of the questions that we hear most often from our students and clients—many of whom are seasoned dealmakers—sounds something like this: “The framework and strategies you have presented are great. They have helped us a lot. But what can you do when you have no power in the negotiation? Can you get a great deal when the other side is holding all the cards?” When we ask our students and clients to explain their situation, we hear many versions of the same basic stories. Here are the most common:

STORY 1:

“In our business, potential customers constantly tell us that we have to lower our price, and that if we don’t lower it, they will go to our competitors. They do not seem to want to talk about anything other than price. And the fact of the matter is, they can go to our competitors and get what they want. How can we possibly negotiate a good deal in such situations?”

STORY 2:

“I recently received a job offer from a company that I would like to work for. The one big problem is that the compensation is not as good as I would like it to be. The other big problem is that my BATNA stinks. I have no other job offers, and I’m pretty desperate. How can I negotiate a better deal for myself?”

STORY 3:

“I am involved in a dispute and the other side is threatening to sue. Their lawsuit is entirely frivolous, but if we go to court, they can continue to litigate until I go bankrupt. They have a lot of money and can easily afford a long court battle. What can I do?”

STORY 4:

“My country is a small player on the world stage. When it comes to negotiating economic or political international agreements, we are constantly being pushed around. More powerful countries overlook our interests, and we practically have to plead for what we most desperately need. Is there some way to improve our position?”

As these stories demonstrate, weakness in negotiation results when the other side’s BATNA is relatively strong and your BATNA is relatively weak. Have you ever felt trapped in such predicaments? How did you respond? In our experience, most people in such situations either panic or quickly accept the futility of trying to negotiate away their misfortune. Few actually do what it takes to negotiate effectively and to improve their outcomes. We have also noticed that those who do think carefully and systematically about such situations, and who do not abandon the negotiation framework developed in this book, are often able to achieve outstanding results in the face of seemingly impossible odds.

In this chapter, we will help you to understand the secrets of these negotiation geniuses. We will first present strategies that you can leverage even when you have little power. We will then share with you strategies for upsetting the balance of power—that is, how you can move from being weak to being strong in the negotiation.

NEGOTIATING WITHOUT POWER

There is perhaps nothing that creates more anxiety for negotiators than the feeling of desperation that comes from having no good alternatives. The situation only worsens when you realize that the other side is not as anxious as you are to do the deal. Whether you are negotiating the specifics of your only job offer or a contract with the only vendor who can provide what you desperately need, knowing that “no deal” would be disastrous can place a lot of pressure on you. Unfortunately, this anxiety can cause you to give up the hope of creating or claiming value and to lose sight of the need to prepare and execute negotiations carefully and systematically. Instead, you begin to focus on getting a deal done at any cost. While it would be unfair for us to suggest that there is no reason to be concerned in such situations,

 it would also be unfair—and wildly inaccurate—to suggest that there is little you can do to improve your prospects. Consider the following strategies:

STRATEGY 1: DON’T REVEAL THAT YOU ARE WEAK

Think back to the story we presented in Chapter 1, in which President Roosevelt’s campaign manager was negotiating with a photographer over how much to pay for the use of three million copies of a photograph. The problem was that the campaign had already printed the three million copies, and the photographer (who owned the copyright to the photograph) had the legal right to charge $1 per copy. The campaign manager’s BATNA was very weak: if an agreeable price could not be negotiated, they would have to throw away the pamphlets or face litigation. Neither of these eventualities came to fruition. Not only did the campaign manager secure the right to use the photograph, but the photographer even offered to pay $250 to consummate the deal.

The key to the campaign manager’s success: the campaign manager’s position was weak, but the photographer did not know that it was weak. Had the photographer known that three million copies of the photograph had already been printed, he would have known that he was in the position of power and could negotiate a more profitable deal.

The obvious lesson: having a weak BATNA is not terribly problematic if the other side does not know that your BATNA is weak. If you have a weak BATNA, don’t advertise it!

Surprisingly enough, many people do not heed this advice; in fact, they often make their bad situation worse by unwittingly revealing the weakness of their BATNA. You do this whenever you tell your customer that “time is of the essence” or that “we can meet with you whenever you have the time.” Often, it is important to convey that you are facing time constraints or that you have a flexible schedule. But you can send the same messages without making your desperation transparent. For example, you might say that “one of our preferences is to move ahead quickly” or that “we have some flexibility with regards to meeting with you.” When you are under pressure and focused on the weakness of your BATNA you may need to remind yourself to use this less revealing language.

STRATEGY 2: OVERCOME YOUR WEAKNESS BY LEVERAGING THEIR WEAKNESS

Recently, an executive student came to Deepak for help with a negotiation. He was attempting to sell his 50 percent stake in a company to his business partner, who controlled the other 50 percent. The seller (Deepak’s student) was focused on the desperation of his situation: he needed liquidity very soon, and his partner was the only viable buyer of his shares. The first thing the seller wanted to discuss was the degree to which he should be willing to devalue his shares in order to make the deal happen. “How low should I be willing to go?” he asked.

Nowhere in his analysis was there a consideration of how much the shares might be worth to the business partner—that is, how high a price the buyer might be willing to pay. When Deepak began to probe in this direction, it became clear that the business partner had much to gain by buying out the seller: the buyer had a lot of money, he had long desired to take the company in new directions that the seller had resisted, and purchasing the shares would give the buyer full control over the company’s future. As the discussion continued, the student began to realize that he was not the only one who was “weak”—the buyer was also weak, albeit for very different reasons. Focusing on these factors helped the seller to increase his target and change the trajectory of the negotiation. In his discussions with the buyer, he outlined the many benefits to the buyer of making this purchase,

 downplayed his own desperation, and anchored aggressively in his opening offer. What was the eventual outcome? The two sides agreed to a deal in which the student sold only 40 percent of the company back to his partner—at a total price that was higher than he had originally hoped to receive for his entire 50 percent.

This story highlights the distinction between negotiators who focus only on their own BATNA and those who evaluate the other side’s BATNA. If their BATNA is weak, that means that you bring a lot of value to the deal—and you should be able to claim some (or much) of that value. In other words, having a weak BATNA is not particularly problematic if the other side’s BATNA is weak as well.

Consider again the success of Roosevelt’s campaign manager. Imagine that the photographer had discovered that the campaign manager’s BATNA was very weak. Would that guarantee a good outcome for the photographer and a poor outcome for the campaign manager? Not necessarily—because the photographer’s BATNA was also weak! If there were “no deal,” the campaign would suffer the costs of reprinting three million pamphlets, but the photographer would also lose a huge (“once in a lifetime”) opportunity to get tremendous public exposure for his artistic work.

What typically happens when both sides are in a position of weakness? If you think back to the fundamental framework developed in Chapter 1, you will recognize that when both parties have a weak BATNA, it means that the ZOPA is large. In other words, a lot of value is created when the two sides reach an agreement. Who claims more of this value? Usually it is the one who understands the fundamentals and leverages the strategies we discussed in Chapter 1. In this case, the one who fares better is the one who makes the other side’s weakness more salient throughout the negotiation. By focusing on the photographer’s opportunity for publicity, the campaign manager was able to secure a great outcome for his side. Meanwhile, the photographer was so focused on the prospect of losing a great opportunity that he failed to consider the value that he could bring to the Roosevelt campaign.

STRATEGY 3: IDENTIFY AND LEVERAGE YOUR DISTINCT VALUE PROPOSITION

Firms that bid for business (such as consulting firms, offshore services firms, quasi-commodity suppliers, construction and landscaping professionals, etc.) often find themselves in a position of weakness. Here is a common complaint: “In our industry, our customers hold an auction for every deal. They solicit bids, and then accept the lowest one. There is no opportunity to create value by introducing multiple issues. Our customers tell us that we must lower our price further, otherwise they will go to our competitors.”

These negotiators are stuck bargaining over only one issue (usually price) in an arena where their competitors can compete effectively on the issue being discussed. Though these situations represent a very specific example of “weakness,” we devote special attention to them here because these are among the most common problems our students and clients face.

How can you create and claim value when your counterpart (typically, your customer) is only interested in discussing price? In many such situations, you can improve your prospects by changing the game you are being forced to play. Consider that, in negotiation, your ability to legitimately claim value is a function of your ability to create value. If you bring nothing to the other side that they cannot get elsewhere, then your offer is no better for them than their BATNA. In other words, the ZOPA is small or nonexistent. Why would they want to make a deal with you?

The good news is that, very often, you do bring something to the table that distinguishes you from your competitors. This is your distinct value proposition (DVP), and it need not be a

 lower price. You may have a better product, a higher-quality service, a good reputation, a strong brand, or a host of other assets that your customer values and that you can provide more effectively or cheaply than your competitors. Keep in mind that your DVP is not just something you think your customer should value, but something they actually value. If you bring such value-adding elements to the deal, you have the possibility of using them to get what you want (for example, a higher margin, repeat business, etc.). The key is to figure out how to make your DVP a factor in the negotiation. This can be difficult when you are stuck in a price-only auction, when the other side seems uninterested in discussing any issue other than price, or when the other side is not familiar with the principle of creating value by negotiating multiple issues. Fortunately, all of these obstacles are surmountable. The following four strategies can help you make your DVP a factor the next time you take part in a negotiation or auction:

Submit multiple proposals. It is not always possible to adequately gauge, prior to making an offer, whether the customer has any interests other than a low price. For this reason, bidders often wonder whether they should bid the lowest possible price or a slightly higher price that includes additional features (such as a higher-quality product or additional services). Next time, try doing both! Instead of submitting one bid, consider making two or more bids simultaneously, a strategy that we initially described in Chapter 3. For example, one bid might be low on price and on service, while the other is somewhat higher on both. If the customer values service, they will appreciate knowing that they can get extra attention from your firm at an additional cost. This strategy will also increase your chances of submitting the winning bid: if they only value price, your low bid will be competitive; if they value other features, your higher bid will be competitive.

Lower your bid just enough to get into the second round. One reason why many companies use price-only auctions is that there are too many potential vendors from which to choose. But not all auctions end with a signed contract. Often, the auction is designed simply to “narrow the field.” For example, a customer might invite ten or more firms to bid for a project, and then winnow the list down to the two or three firms with the lowest price bids. These candidates are then invited to engage in one-on-one negotiations. Our Harvard colleagues Guhan Subramanian and Richard Zeckhauser have coined the term negotiauction to describe this two-stage process. In such situations, you need not submit the lowest bid; rather, you should submit a bid that is low enough to pass the initial hurdle, and then try to create value when negotiating multiple issues with the customer.

Keep in mind that your customers may not necessarily “announce” a formal negotiauction (most will not have heard the term) or explain the rules ahead of time. But they may still proceed as though that is the process they are following. Moreover, many customers will be willing to discuss your multi-issue proposal even after the auction is over if you were a “low enough” bidder. As such, it is often a good idea to reach out to your customers after you have “lost” the auction to see if you are in a position to offer a package deal that they value.

One of our students recently described to us how his firm ended up on the losing end of this strategy. His firm was competing against five other firms who were all vying for the same prized customer. The customer held an auction and announced that two of the five firms would advance to the final round of negotiations. The student’s firm was one of the two to advance. “We were

 pretty excited,” recalled the student. “We knew how to position our firm in relation to this [one remaining] competitor, and we were confident that the deal was ours. But we lost the deal—to a competitor who had not even made it past the initial auction!” While our student and his colleagues were celebrating, the sales team of the third firm had gone back to the customer and made the case that they could provide the best package deal, despite how the auction had turned out.

These strategies can help you negotiate effectively even when you find yourself in a position of weakness. Remember that there are often opportunities to improve your outcomes and claim value, even when it seems like the odds are stacked against you. By employing these strategies, you can navigate negotiations from a position of strength and achieve better results.

	Take the agent out of the game. A common complaint among negotiators who are forced to compete solely on price sounds something like this: “We are a high-value partner for our customer. Unfortunately, the customer uses a purchasing agent to negotiate its deals, and this agent is compensated entirely based on how low a price she negotiates. The next thing we know, we’re stuck in an auction where the only thing that matters is who can provide the cheapest product. We lose—and the customer loses, too. The only winner is the purchasing agent!”

Intermediaries such as purchasing agents—whose incentives are not always aligned with those who have hired them to negotiate on their behalf—constitute one of the biggest barriers to efficient dealmaking. But there are ways to keep such intermediaries from derailing your negotiation. Here are two strategies for doing so, based on the successful experience of our executive students and clients:

- Send a copy of your proposals to the customer. Some months ago, one of our students decided to try the strategy of submitting multiple proposals to the purchasing agent, and so he submitted a high-price/high-value offer and a low-price/low-value offer. His low-price offer was accepted. Some weeks later he discovered (in a conversation with the customer) that the customer had never even seen the high-price proposal! In other words, the agent had conveniently eliminated it from the “short list” that was submitted to the customer. Having learned from that experience, our student now makes a habit of sending to his customers (“as a courtesy”) a copy of any proposal he submits to the purchasing agent. “Even if the customer chooses not to look at the information I send,” explains our student, “the very fact that it’s sitting on the boss’s desk makes the purchasing agent think twice before he tries to disregard my high-value proposal.”

- Negotiate a post-settlement settlement with the customer. When our clients and executive students tell us that pressure from the agent is forcing them to sideline their distinct value proposition in an effort to lower the price, we often tell them not to worry. Typically, purchasing agents exit the scene once they have served their purpose (albeit self-servingly) of choosing a vendor. If you really have the ability to create additional value for the customer (beyond cutting price), you will be in a strong position to pitch your proposition once you are dealing with the party that stands to benefit from “hearing you out.” In other words, don’t assume you are stuck with an inefficient agreement; if both sides can be made better off, you can always revise the agreement after you have won the deal.

Educate your customers between deals. How often do you communicate with your customers (or potential customers) when there is no potential deal on the table? You might send your customers a holiday card once a year, but how often do you reach out to educate them about your ability to provide them with new sources of value? If you are like the vast majority of negotiators, you spend little (if any) time doing so. But if your customers do not understand your distinct value proposition, then that is exactly what you should be doing. It should come as no surprise that customers will value your input and insights most when they have the time to listen to you, when they are least concerned about cutting costs, and when they are under no pressure to commit to anything. These conditions are most often in place when there is no deal on the table—that is, when they are not likely to disregard your comments as an attempt to manipulate them. In the middle of an auction, time pressure, cost concerns, and pressure to make a final decision all work against you. But those who reach out to their customers (and potential customers) in between auctions have the possibility of

 building relationships, learning about their customers’ interests and, most importantly, making their DVP a factor in the next negotiation or auction. Most customers are willing to discuss these matters openly and will appreciate your desire to understand their needs. In at least a few cases that we know of, vendors were able to pre-empt their customers’ next auctions entirely; by signaling an interest in understanding and meeting the customers’ needs and negotiating multiple issues simultaneously, they were able to sign deals before they ever went to auction! This should not be too surprising: both sides stand to benefit by engaging in negotiations that extend beyond discussions of price. Sometimes all the customer needs is a little bit of encouragement—or education—to push them in the direction of their own self-interest.

STRATEGY 4: IF YOUR POSITION IS VERY WEAK, CONSIDER RELINQUISHING WHAT LITTLE POWER YOU DO HAVE

Many years ago, when Deepak was a senior in college, he received a job offer from a consulting firm. Deepak loved the offer, with one exception: the salary was lower than he had hoped it would be. Deepak called the HR manager and asked whether salaries were negotiable. The HR manager told him that salaries were not negotiable but offered to set up a lunch with the managing partner so that Deepak could discuss any issues that concerned him. At lunch, after an hour of pleasant conversation, the managing partner explained that the firm calculated starting salaries using a very simple formula in which only three factors mattered: the college the new hire had attended, his or her academic major, and prior work experience. Since they had already considered these factors, they could not increase Deepak’s salary.

Deepak knew that he had very little power in the negotiation: he had no better offer to use as leverage, and he estimated that “holding out for more” would result in little, if any, increase in salary. He decided to try a different kind of strategy altogether.

Deepak responded by saying that he understood the partner’s perspective, that he really loved the firm, and that he would definitely accept the offer. Having said that, Deepak continued, would the partner be willing to continue the discussion regarding his salary? With the partner’s consent, Deepak made an extensive argument that boiled down to the following: he would bring more value to the firm than the simple formula suggested. He concluded by emphasizing that salary was not the most important issue to him—he had already accepted the offer because he was very excited about the opportunity to work at this firm—but that salary was nonetheless an issue, as it would be for any young person starting out in life. If there were any help that the firm could give him, it would be greatly appreciated.

The partner liked what he heard and promised Deepak that he would at least give this perspective some thought. The following day, the partner called Deepak to tell him that the firm would give him a 10 percent increase in salary because they had “taken another look at his [summer] work experience and decided that it probably should have been given more weight in the first place.”

Was that really the reason for the raise? Deepak thinks that is unlikely. The more likely reason is a simple but significant insight regarding power: if you have very little power, you may be better off giving it up entirely. Put another way, if you can’t outmuscle the other side in a negotiation, you may want to stop flexing your muscles and, instead, simply ask them to help you. When negotiators try to leverage their power, others reciprocate. This pattern can be disastrous when you are the weaker party. But when you make it clear that you have no intention of fighting or negotiating aggressively, others may also soften their stance. Once the managing partner decided that he

 wanted to help Deepak, he simply needed to find a way to justify this decision. Once he found a way, Deepak got what he wanted.

STRATEGY 5: STRATEGIZE ON THE BASIS OF YOUR ENTIRE NEGOTIATION PORTFOLIO

Max recently consulted with a firm in an industry where profit margins have fallen from about 20 percent to less than 5 percent over the last decade. This decline in margins has been due to an increase in new market entrants and to a growing perception among customers that the competitors in the industry are interchangeable. In an attempt to learn about the firm and industry, Max asked the firm’s executives how often they simply refused to reduce their margins below 10 percent. In other words, how often did they risk losing the deal in hopes of earning a higher profit margin? The executives responded that the days were long gone when they could try to be so tough—they needed every dollar of revenue that they could get. Max then asked them to estimate what percentage of their business they would lose if they held out for 10 percent margins. Their estimate: at least 25 percent. At that point, Max simply recommended doing some arithmetic: “If you double your margins [from 5 percent to 10 percent],” Max noted, “and you lose even 49 percent of your business, you are still better off in terms of overall profit.”

The results of this simple analysis came as a surprise to the executives. But their surprise is not, in fact, surprising. Too often, when negotiators are myopically focused on the current negotiation, the strategy they adopt is not an effective one for their portfolio of negotiations. If you had only one deal to negotiate, it would make sense for you to reduce your margins as much as necessary to win the deal; after all, any amount of money is preferable to no money at all (assuming that no money is what you will get by pursuing your BATNA). But because there are almost always multiple negotiations to consider, you need a strategy that makes sense for your entire portfolio of negotiations. If you are going to negotiate many deals with many different customers, you may be willing to lose some money in one negotiation (because you held out for a higher margin and lost the deal) in order to win even more money in another negotiation (because you held out for a higher margin and they accepted). Better yet, if you can distinguish between those negotiators who will accept a higher margin and those who will not—and if you can justify charging different prices to different customers—you may be in a position to increase profits even further by charging higher margins only to those who can stomach it.

The key is to audit the implicit assumptions you make when formulating your negotiation strategy. You may perceive yourself as being “weak” if you measure strength only as the ability to push hard in any given negotiation without losing the deal. But you may discover that you are actually quite “strong” once you begin to think about your ability to withstand losing some deals because you are maximizing the value of your entire negotiation portfolio. When you consider your entire portfolio, it is far easier to imagine taking bigger risks, keeping the clients for whom you can add the most value, and becoming more profitable.

UPSETTING THE BALANCE OF POWER

Weakness is always frustrating, but perhaps never more so than when the other side acknowledges the value you create but still pushes you around—simply because they are bigger and stronger and can do whatever they want. Maybe your largest customer thinks it has the right to make onerous last-minute demands or to ignore some of its contractual responsibilities. Or perhaps your competitor has decided to sue you for infringing on their patent—a case that has little merit but that they can litigate to the hilt thanks to their deep pockets

. If you want to stay in business, such bullies implicitly say, you will have to play by their rules. In some cases, small business owners are held hostage by their employees; their top salesperson might be rude, unprofessional, and overpaid, but if he leaves the firm and joins the competition, they will lose half of their business.

In each of these situations, your prospects seem bleak for two reasons. First, you are in a position of weakness. Second, you are dealing with a person or an organization that is inconsiderate of your needs and entirely cavalier in the pursuit of their own self-interest. How might you negotiate in such instances? Begin by considering the various strategies we have outlined above for negotiating without power. If these are not sufficient, consider exercising a different, potentially powerful option: shifting the balance of power in your favor. As we will demonstrate, some negotiations require us not to improve our ability to play the game as it has been defined but to change the nature of the game itself. The following strategies will help you turn the tables on would-be bullies and achieve outcomes far superior to those you might otherwise expect.

STRATEGY 1: INCREASE YOUR STRENGTH BY BUILDING COALITIONS WITH OTHER WEAK PARTIES

In their book Negotiating Rationally, Max Bazerman and Margaret Neale tell the story of how Lee Iacocca, then CEO of Chrysler, found a way to mitigate his company’s weakness by building a coalition with other weak parties: his U.S. competitors. In 1986, the three U.S. auto companies (General Motors, Ford, and Chrysler) were engaged in extremely unhealthy competition as each tried to gain market share through the use of rebates. Each time one company announced a rebate, the other two rushed to raise their own rebate offer. Before long, the auto companies were losing money, on average, on every car they sold! Iacocca recognized that because of this escalation problem, the automakers were in a very weak position vis-à-vis the consumer. He decided to put an end to this by announcing to the press that Chrysler would discontinue its rebate program—but that if either of the other two companies continued to offer rebates, Chrysler would match those rebates. This action by Chrysler helped to end the rebate war, stopped profit erosion in the industry, and returned all three U.S. automakers to profitability.

Why was Iacocca’s strategy effective? Because it shifted power away from buyers and toward sellers. When a company offers to match its competitors’ offers, this can turn out to be a very bad deal for consumers; such initiatives eliminate the incentive that competitors have to lower their prices (or offer rebates) to attract customers. As a result, the three U.S. automakers, which could no longer be pitted one against another on price alone, gained bargaining power.

You can use the same strategy—building coalitions with other weak parties—in your own negotiations. Consider that, when your customer has many other companies from whom he can purchase, you are in a weak position, but so is each of your competitors. When your boss has the option of hiring or firing you, you are in a weak position, but so is each of your coworkers. And when your country is small and has little voice in international negotiations, your country is in a weak position, but so are many other small countries. Fortunately for those who have little power in their negotiations, it is sometimes possible to shift the balance of power by aligning with these other weak entities.

For example, when bargaining with management, individual employees have often banded together to form unions. If a company were to negotiate with employees one at a time, it could credibly threaten to hire someone else

 if the employee’s demands were perceived as excessive. When employees bargain collectively, however, they avoid competing against one another. The result is typically an above-market wage for all employees. This process effectively shifts power and money from shareholders to employees. A similar rationale has led many small businesses in the United States to negotiate collectively with insurance companies in order to lower the cost of health insurance and has led many small farmers in developing countries to form “cooperatives” that allow them to negotiate higher prices for the produce they take to market.

In the realm of international relations, a vivid example of the power of coalitions surfaced during the 2003 World Trade Organization negotiations in Cancún, Mexico. Disgruntled by the continued lack of attention paid to the issues of concern to developing nations (such as reducing agricultural tariffs and farm subsidies), twenty-one “weak” countries banded together to create the Group of 21. This group is now in a much stronger position to negotiate for the interests of its members than any member nation would have been on its own.

In each of these examples, coalition building among weaker parties led to a weakening of the previously more powerful side’s BATNA. When you build—and are able to sustain—a coalition with other weak parties, you make it difficult for the other side to pit one weak party against another or to credibly threaten to walk away from the deal.

			STRATEGY 2: LEVERAGE THE POWER OF YOUR EXTREME WEAKNESS—THEY MAY NEED YOU TO SURVIVE

In 1919, after the end of World War I, the leaders of the victorious Allied forces (most notably, the United States, Great Britain, and France) met in Paris to conduct many months of negotiations that would determine the fate of Europe and much of the rest of the world. Many of the countries affected by the war were invited to make appeals and arguments to the Allies regarding their fate. Most of these arguments pertained to the reshaping of geographic boundaries. The negotiations led to the birth of some new nations, as well as to the reshaping of existing boundaries that helped some countries while hurting others. Most nations that gained territory had been strong allies of the victors and could thus justify a claim to the “spoils” of war. But among those that profited from these talks was a weak country that had contributed relatively little to the Allied war effort: Romania. When the negotiations ended, Romania had roughly doubled in size. How was this possible? Why was Romania able to claim so much value when it had done little, if anything, to create value?

Romania’s power lay not in its strength but in its weakness. Here’s why: When the war ended, the greatest perceived threat to the Allied nations (in particular, to Great Britain and the United States) was not a resurgence of the defeated enemy. Rather, it was communism, the recently empowered political philosophy that had made its debut with Russia’s 1917 October Revolution. Because of the great fear of communism’s potential to spread westward, Romania, which lay immediately to the west of Russia, suddenly became an important consideration. If Romania fell, communism would gain another large foothold in Europe. The leaders of Romania did not want this to happen; more important, they knew that the Allied forces did not want this to happen—and that is how they were able to extract more value from the postwar negotiations than they might have otherwise “deserved.” Romania’s argument can be simplified thus: give us what we ask for, or else we will remain weak; then we will be destroyed, and you will suffer as a consequence.

Similar dynamics play out in business contexts as well. In one case, two companies that had signed a joint-venture (JV) agreement found themselves enmeshed in a bitter dispute when one of the companies, anxious about the other’s growing presence in a market in which they competed, threatened to sue for patent infringement. The defendant knew that the case was frivolous, but also knew that the plaintiff, a much larger company, could afford to litigate until the defendant went into bankruptcy. Despite its seemingly precarious situation, the defendant managed to convince its JV partner to drop the lawsuit and to reach a mutually agreeable settlement. The defendant’s argument was essentially the following: “If you take us to court, you have the power to push us into bankruptcy. Clearly, we do not want this. But let’s also think about what this would mean for you: you would lose a valuable partner. It would be best for both of us if we could set aside the threat of patent litigation and see whether we can work out an agreement that allows us to continue using the disputed technology, for you to feel more secure about your market position, and for us to continue a value-creating relationship that capitalizes on our synergies.”

What is the underlying principle of this strategy? If you create value for others, you gain at least some power to claim value for yourself—regardless of whether the other side wishes to reward you for what you bring to the table. In extreme cases, when they push too hard, they potentially hurt themselves. They may not recognize this

, however, which is why it is worth reminding them that strength is not simply measured by “what you can force others to do” or “how easily you can make someone’s life miserable” rather, it may be better measured by “what value you can create for others.” As a result, it is often useful to tell the negotiation “bully” that an overly strong show of force can be counterproductive: “If you push me too hard, you’ll destroy me—and lose a value-creating partner.”

STRATEGY 3: UNDERSTAND—AND ATTACK—THE SOURCE OF THEIR POWER

For many years now, Planned Parenthood medical clinics across the United States have faced a recurring problem. Every so often, antiabortion protestors picket outside the clinics in the hope of discouraging women from entering them. The strategy seems to work quite well; many women who might otherwise visit the clinics are daunted by the prospect of passing through a large crowd that is waving signs and hurling verbal abuse. Setting aside the moral and political elements of this conflict, how might the clinics deal with the strategic problem of reducing the number of intimidating protestors?

A number of Planned Parenthood clinics around the country have adopted a particularly creative strategy for fighting back, usually referred to as the “Pledge-a-Picket” program. Here’s how it works: The clinic asks its supporters to pledge donations to the clinic on a per protestor basis. The more protestors that show up to picket the clinic, the more money the clinic raises in donations! For example, if someone pledges 50 cents per protestor, and one hundred protestors show up at the clinic, that supporter will donate $50 to the clinic. Many clinics have used this strategy to effectively reduce the incentive of protestors to show up to picket, and some have raised tens of thousands of dollars in pledges. The Planned Parenthood of Central Texas (PPCT) in Waco has even posted a sign outside its clinic that reads: “Even Our Protesters Support Planned Parenthood.”

As the Pledge-a-Picket story reveals, it is not enough that you recognize the strengths and weaknesses of each side. It is also critical that you understand the source of each side’s strengths and weaknesses. Once the Planned Parenthood clinics understood that the source of their opponents’ power was the ability to draw large numbers of protestors outside the clinic, they were able to think of a novel way of diminishing the benefits of doing so.

A student of Deepak’s who owns a highly successful real-estate development company recently used this strategy to deal with a problem that will seem strange to many Americans. His company is located in a country where blatant political corruption is much more common than in the United States. In this particular case, the developer was awaiting governmental approval for a very lucrative construction project that he had signed. Everything was ready to go when, suddenly, the approval process was stopped dead in its tracks. The reason became clear days later when the developer received a phone call from the son of the powerful elected official who was in charge of signing off on the approval. The son wanted a stake in the project, and he made it clear that if the partnership were accepted, the approval would be granted quickly. The developer knew that it was possible to circumvent the son (and his father) by going through the court system and by contacting other officials with more seniority, but that process would take a long time. Unfortunately, time was of the essence; his company was about to go public, with an initial public offering (IPO) scheduled in three months. If potential investors were to discover that the project might not be approved, the company would be valued somewhat less. More problematic would be the timing of such a rumor. If the politician’s son was rebuffed, he could decide to publicize

 the approval problems just when the company was about to go public. What to do?

Deepak advised the following strategy, which the developer executed with much success: go public immediately with the information regarding potential delays in approval. In other words, reveal to the media that the project is under way, but that its approval will probably not be finalized until some months after the company goes public. At the same time, the developer should release all of the documents related to the merits of the project, as well as the letters that the politician sent earlier in support of the project’s approval. That way, investor confidence will remain high.

This strategy has at least three obvious merits. First, by getting ahead of the story, the developer controls how the news is reported and interpreted. Second, by making this information public two months before the IPO, the news itself is made less salient to investors by the time the company goes public. Third, and perhaps most important, with the news already in the press, the politician’s son loses his only source of leverage. Because the son’s power lies primarily in his ability to damage the developer when he is most vulnerable (during the IPO), that is the element to be targeted. As with the Pledge-a-Picket strategy, this strategy identifies and destroys the primary source of an opponent’s power.

The same principle applies to negotiations of all sorts. If you are afraid to confront your powerful salesperson, or are wary of denying his request for yet another exorbitant raise, consider the source of the salesperson’s power. In this case, it may be that the salesperson has stronger relationships with your customers than you do. Knowing this, how might you strategize? In the weeks and months ahead, begin building relationships with each of your key customers. You might even lock them in with attractive multiyear contracts. Then, when you stand up to your salesperson’s demands, there is little with which he can threaten you. He may choose to leave the firm and go to a competitor, but his ability to take your customers with him will be significantly weakened.

THE POWER OF GENIUS

All of the strategies and insights discussed in this chapter stem from one crucial insight: while being in a position of weakness is sometimes unavoidable, you will negotiate most effectively when you leverage the fundamentals—systematic preparation and careful strategy formulation. Unfortunately, many negotiators compound the problem of weakness by becoming obsessed by the factors that make them weak. This does not mean that you should ignore your weaknesses. But, as dangerous as it is to ignore your weaknesses, it can be equally devastating to overlook your strengths or to assume you have none.

Those who “think weak” inevitably also “act weak.” If you are obsessed by your weaknesses, you will be less likely to set reasonably high aspirations, to feel confident asking for more information, to demand that your concessions be reciprocated, or to push the other side to consider the value proposition you are offering. You will also be more susceptible to influence tactics and threats.

Negotiation geniuses recognize their weaknesses and try to mitigate them. Once they have done so, they know they must also focus on their strengths, prepare systematically, and negotiate with an eye toward improving their negotiating position. Doing so will not guarantee “victory,” but it will ensure that you have done as well as possible given the situation. Indeed, the power of negotiation genius may be most valuable to you in precisely those situations where the alternative is to despair—or to rely on gut instinct.


